Use these colors to accessorize.
Does it harm Mr Wight if he ranks high on this “league table”? I think not. It was not suggested, as I understand it, that he had controlled the table or indeed that he had had any access to it. Even if he was completely in the wrong about his evidence, this seems again a side issue, irrelevant to the case as a whole and therefore not appropriate to hang a perjury case upon. He agreed that there were 17 “referrals” to Mr Whittamore, so even if it was actually 70, I can’t see how that fits the definition of perjury.
Aparently the Great Obamases and iDave have spoken about the death of aid worker Linda Norgrove.
There's no signboard - in any language - over the tiny Newar food shop, which could serve as a textbook illustration of the phrase "hole in the wall," and if you don't know it you're unlikely to stumble upon the dimly-lit shop by chance. The best way to find it is to go behind the famous Patan Durbar Square Krishna temple and look for Nepalis disappearing into the wooden-door storefront, between a jewelery shop and a bronze sculpture store.
I am a huge fan of many Norwegian bands, vocalists, and just regular people I have met who were tourists in the U.S.
(An aside: this was pretty much the only precinct map I could find. There must be better ones than that. Anyone have any idea where they'd be?)
“Oh come, let us worship and bow down; let us kneel before the LORD, our Maker! For he is our God, and we are the people of his pasture, and the sheep of his hand. Today, if you hear his voice, do not harden your hearts, as at Meribah, as on the day at Massah in the wilderness,” Psalm 95:6-8
This can be very confusing for anyone, but especially a child.
Some changes are just too expensive and risky, others favour one stakeholder over another (e.g. will the infrastructure business come out on top?), and others are just imagined to be impossible because ‘that’s just the way we do things around here’. Be aware of these factors, and challenge your own assumptions from time to time.
In all, the FBI required 700 grand jury subpoenas to access 18 email accounts, 20,000 emails and 10,000 unique telephone numbers, she said. For three years, she said, Shahzad had operated very much “under the radar”— free of dogmatic rhetoric and working within respectable professions. In fact, he became a U.S. citizen in 2009 and held an MBA in finance.
I’ve read and re-read (parts of) The No-Cry Sleep Solution and I am satisfied that it will meet my needs. As a dog trainer, part of me was hesitant about this book, because the one thing I couldn’t really by-pass in my brain was the little voice that says “cry it out relies on operant conditioning. What could possibly work that does not use operant conditioning, and consequently, CIO?”
Google used to have a way to see your social circle in a beta test mode, but as of this writing they appear­ed to have pulled it, possibly in preparation for releasing Google+, their own social net­work.
At this point Grace finally lost all patience with her irritating riddle-mate, clasped the shovel firmly with both hands and beat Kevin repeatedly over the spleen until he resembled a small hedgehog out for a turn on the river.
The Penguins won 5-2 and Crosby got an assist so I'm guessing Rangers fans define "suck" wrong. It was a fun evening even if I did fear for my life because I was cheering against the home team (just kidding).
Diesel and Fritz were stronger than me, but they weren’t faster. Besides, not many feel like running after a night of drinking. They didn’t and that gave me a head start.
I heard him give an impromptu speech at a writer’s conference several years ago. The conference was at Wheaton College. Chuck Colson was speaking at another conference at the college. Robert Walker, who ran the conference, saw him and asked him to stop by and say a few words to us. I don’t remember what he said but I remember feeling awe.
Heat & Bond Lite fusible stabilizer
The waiter informed us that there was no chance of sun today, only humidity and the possibility of rain in the afternoon, this after sweaty rain showers the night before.
Playing all four games in the campaign at one go gives the orc player and advantage lacking in comparison to playing the four games separately. King F'Yar and the F'Yar Guard can only be committed to one of the opening battles. However given the mobility afforded by his wyvern mount, King F'Yar should be able to fly to where ever he is most needed in the space of a turn or three.
4) Back to the mess in Madison. Gov. Walker wants you to believe that taxpayers are on the hook for state employee pension plans. A blatant lie as the employees contribute 100% to this fund from their own wages. The media hasn't covered this aspect so it's no wonder some people are up in arms over this issue. Quite frankly, the unions have agreed to all wage and benefit cuts proposed by the Governor. What they don't want to lose is collective bargaining rights. Walker refuses to compromise as his ultimate goal is to bust unions to please big business interests and corporations. The pension facts are covered nicely here. And here.
I am not saying that people should be gay; all I am saying is that it makes sense to be accommodative of them because they are here to stay. Hell, they even make good Army Generals; even in war, they just can’t leave their friends behind. My pastor always said, “Jesus loves you no matter who you are” and I agree with him. However, be cautious WHERE you are told that “Jesus loves you”. Apparently in Mexican and Spanish prisons, if a person tells you, “Jesus loves you!” my friend, please be afraid. Be very afraid. Anyway, now I am off to find a noose to hang myself with as I am pretty sure this post has definitely done the same thing to my budding career as a writer.
We had been hoping to squeeze a quick half in at the Tunnel End, Dutton, but it was Chala's day out and she was getting hungry, so we took a rather bizarre route (what WF rather incongruously described as "the old roads", meaning a bewildering series of back lanes, endless direction changes and needless detours that would look like a childs scribble if plotted on a map) to Little Bollington next to the entrance to Dunham Massey Country Park.
This fear is exemplified in a piece appearing today in Bilderberg-controlled newspaper the Financial Times entitled Greece’s exit may become the euro’s envy.
This came together really easily though. Even easier than I thought it would be given that I completely forgot to toast the bread. And then I forgot to slice the bread for the sandwich part. I got a little over eager about using these rolls I had picked up. No harm, no foul.
Statement issued by Cllr Mervyn Cirota, DA Member of the Shadow Mayoral Committee for Public Safety -JHB, October 19 2011
Rissad held out the Stable Rod. "I'll fill you in when I get back, then. Can you buy me some time to get away?" Beneath cold ferocity, there was a haunted touch to his eyes, almost but not quite lost in the haggard slackness of the skin of his cheeks.
I made this recipe a little while back, so I didn’t take pictures throughout, sorry! If you aren’t a mustard fan leave the dijon out because it does give it a mustard taste. If you like mustard, leave it in. I have found myself adding bits of mustard to nearly all my macaroni and cheese type recipes because it just adds a little kick and extra flavor. Mustard and extra sharp cheddar are a solid pairing.
Should it come today, what many may say
Last February, five members of the Russian feminist punk-rock collective, Pussy Riot performed a 'punk prayer' next to the main altar of Mosco's Christ the Saviour Cathedral, that is not open to anyone but a priest..... A video of the incident can be seen below, where their faces masked with colourful stylish balaclavas sang a song wth an obscene chorus, appearing to mock Patriarch Kirill, head of the Russian Orthodox Church and apparently savaging Vladimir Putin. 3 were subsequently arrested and charged with hooliganism ( Nadya Tolokonnikova, Maria Alehina and Yekaterina Samusevich) a little bit over the top in my opinion and leave Putin and the Russian Orthodox Church up for more mockery, if they take away the freedom from Pussy Riot. Blind moral panics about , I suppose are nothing new...... going back to the witch hunts and the dawning of punk and rock and roll.......
Abby cleared her throat. “I spent the night in my new house–makin’ more room for outta town kin here at Sam’s–so I’m not sure what-all was said and done,” she hastened to explain. “But when Phoebe and Ruth heard Zanna slippin’ downstairs in the wee hours, they thought she was meetin’ up with you!”
Last week was crazy and full of some firsts for our family...
Each Christmas, we carefully remove our ornaments from their tissue paper cocoons. As we hang them on the tree, we retell the stories. It’s like a crazy quilt, where scraps of colorful memories are pieced together and, voila! E pluribus unum! From the contributions of individuals we have compiled a portrait of one family, and from the many generations we have pieced together one history.
I couldn't count the taps which jut out of every spare inch of the back wall of the curved bar area, but let's just say there are probably as many taps as there are states in the Union. (Okay, maybe a bit less, but there are plenty!)
But. The interview went well, and they’re flying me out for the final round on-site!
Yes, definitely. I have taught teens and children as well as bringing up two kids myself. I relate very well to younger people and have an empathy with them and their view of the world. Therefore I found it quite easy to write about characters who are 14 years old. And of course when you teach for 25 years you have an enormous fund of anecdotes and interesting characters to weave into your writing. My field was special needs and so I taught kids who had a wide range of difficulties and backgrounds and this has certainly influenced some of the choices I have made in my work. For example, Lindy, the bad girl in HIDDEN, keeps the nail on her right forefinger sharpened to a point. It’s quite terrifying. I taught a girl who did this for a while, basically because she was quite a frightened person and this made her very aggressive. Eventually we helped her to relax and feel more confident and she cut the nail right down.
Does the proposed diagnostic category medicalise rape or at least medicalise rape fantasy?
In the spirit of one chapter ending and another beginning, here are my five favorite posts from the semester:
For a day or so,
A very interesting experience beheld me on a recent Thursday Evening. I had just finished off an hour of subjecting myself as a human voodoo doll with my electrologist. With two and a half years invested in clearing my beard, the results were finally being seen. It was becoming a challenge now to find fill the hour with enough hairs to remove and becoming less of a challenge to achieve a flawless finish when I went out enfemme.
The lesson here is basically this: BACK UP YOUR PROJECTS!
There was one particular comment I disagreed with. During the online streaming one of the blurry participants said with great authority, “The objetive of the media is ….” which I disapproved solely because the statement was singular. Media – perhaps journalism – is in a state of flux as the digital renaissance has offered transformational change. There are as many objectives as there are many expectations. My question is how do we manifest these aspirational goals as a practical action plan?
We have camped in the Pyrenees, bartered in the markets of Istanbul, walked the walls of Dubrovnik, partied in Barcelona, explored the castles of Prague, the churches of Italy and the pubs of London, but nothing quite prepared us for the honeymoon.
how it once flourished freely and full
I joined a new gym by my new office. I liked my old gym, Body Business, a lot, but proximity is a big key to my gym attendance. If I have no choice but to drive past it on my way home, I will likely go. However, if I have to drive out of my way to see it, or if it's inconvenient insofar as the "picking up of the kids" ritual goes, I will likely never attend.
If they have to be assholes, why can't they at least be semi-reasonable ass-holes? Something like "we're going to beat you like a red-headed step-child". Or, "we're going to kick your asses up one side of the street and down the other". Maybe throw in something like "we're going to chew you up for breakfast and spit you out for lunch". How about "military exercise these nuts." Anything that would sufficiently demonstrate their agitation while demonstrating something of a human touch in addition to the braggadocio. Maybe even a hint of a sense of humor.
Not knowing whether there would be room at the zoo moorings, and we were only looking for a mooring for the weekend, we attempted a few places, without any joy of getting anywhere near the bank, even at the marked 48 hour moorings, halfway between the wharf and the zoo. As we got closer I eventually got close enough to be able to get off, and whilst Jo looked after the boat I walked to the zoo moorings, mop in hand. As I got closer to the bridge hole, the depth was getting deeper. I could see the moorings on the other side of the bridge were free, not one boat moored there, so I carried on to test the depth. The group of walkers having lunch the other side of the bridge hole were intrigued with what I was doing with the mop. It all became clear when I explained that the bands of colour on the handle are not just for decoration, but if the blue band disappears below the water level, then the mooring is deep enough for us to moor in. I returned to the boat and we moved up to the moorings, and settled in f0r the weekend.
You know what’s best and you have given the best
Bother you any more.”
Pedicures- We had little tubs with peppermint salts for the girls to soak their feet. All the leaders just brought fingernail polish from home and they painted each others toe nails.
- Her songs are about real things in her life (at least on the new album)
Self-titled “safari specialists” Somak Holidays runs a meerkat expedition called Meerkat Madness that covers the Kalahari and the Namib Deserts.
A second form of intellectual property that is especially vulnerable on the Internet is a company’s copyrights. Unlike trademarks, which have to be registered (for federal protection anyway), copyrights are in full force in effect the minute one creates a work. For instance, this blog posting has been copyrighted by virtue of its creation (though enforcement in federal courts does require registration). If we find someone has used text from this blog elsewhere on the Internet without proper attribution, we can send what’s known in the industry as a DMCA Take-Down Notice. Such a notice puts the host on notice that they could be liable for contributory copyright infringement if the offending text is not removed from the Internet. Not wanting to be wrapped up in a lawsuit, a host will often take down an entire website – not just the offending text. This not only applies to text, but also anything else that is copyrightable such as music, pictures, movies, and even graphics. The penalties for copyright violations can also be criminal – not just civil. For instance, one music lover of a band posted the band’s unreleased songs on the Internet. That not only resulted in the website being taken down, but the offending party’s arrest and prosecution (he received house arrest for a few years). Like with trademark violations, websites with foreign domains which are hosted overseas, are often untouchable to those seeking to enforce their copyrights unless you want to learn the ins and outs of the court systems in countries such as Kazakhstan.
To be seen by many eyes
The Prime Minister recalled his brother Yoni, who was the commander and the only IDF casualty in the daring raid on Entebbe to rescue more than 100 hostages on a plane hijacked to Uganda.
Premier League games will not get any bigger than this as the two giants of Manchester go head to head at the Etihad, in a game that will go a long way in deciding the title race.
College provide the backdrop for two moving and resounding stories, one told through the
He allowed sisupal to insult Him because Krsna had promised sisupal mother’s to forgive his 100 offences.
- Japanese in China during the war adopted the “three all” policy of “kill all, burn all, destroy all”
This is from the happy, upbeat (not), The Prince and the Goose Girl by Elinor Mordaunt.
Saul heard the rules and the conditions laid out by God through the prophet Samuel. But he took matters in his own hands and thought only of the physical benefits. He saw it through his own eyes and not those of the Lord. God again spoke through the prophet Samuel in verse 23. “Because thou hast rejected the word of the Lord, he hath also rejected thee from being king.” God does not play games or condone partial obedience. It’s either God’s way or it is not God’s way. Have you made up your mind which way you are going?
The tomatoes are growing and one has almost reached the top of the cage, the other one is growing more wide than up, but I have a feeling that might change here once they get more of this great weather. I have transplanted my jalapenos, serranos, and anaheim chilis to the garden box and they seem to be taking well to their new home.
5.rock n roll all night
One blessing that has come from attending the same church for 20+ years is watching people I love go through extreme adversity and handle it with grace and dignity. I've also watched people that have become bitter or rebellious. We are always quick to give them an excuse, "well, they've had a hard life... etc." But I find myself so impressed with the ones that handle adversity and come out on the other side stronger. People are always watching. My parents and grandparents are not perfect but what I've watched since I was a little girl was how they would pick up the pieces from their mistakes and continue forward.
And I just read an amazing collection of short fiction called It Was Just, Yesterday by Mirga Unge, a Swedish writer. She has a kind of brilliance in writing long, breathless prose that explores mainly but not exclusively young women's voices. Her stories have many surprises, and I loved her view of the world, she has an eye for a short story, that's for sure.
6. Travel More
I'm not sure I want to reunite with the old me. Who was the old me anyway? I'm about to see her in classmate's eyes, hear about her in their recollections. Did I know her as well as I thought I did? Was she better or worse than the figment of my imagination? What DID people think of me? What WILL people think of me? Will my hair look okay?
Mercy, mercy the references to past episodes. I have already mentioned Jack’s blending and betrayal. There is also appearances by every major Jaffa and Tok’ra character who were anywhere near Vancouver at the time of filming. Jack and Sam share an awkward moment when the Tok’ra lie detector is used and it brings back memories of Jack’s confession of feelings for her. Teal’c namedrops Apophis. Jacob talks about his cancer. So on and so on. All the new Sci Fi viewers should now be caught up to date with the Showtime years.
This has been a tradition in my house on Christmas Eve. For as long as I can remember, the story was shared on Christmas Eve, albeit a different version, A Hallmark Pop Up Book, also written by Clement C. Moore! 20+ years later, the book still holds a place on my bookshelf and I pull it out to enjoy on Christmas Eve!
1 lead
Western hostility arises from the refusal of Tehran and Damascus to accept US hegemony over the region, including its support for Israel’s ethnic-cleansing policies and its accelerated colonisation of the West Bank.
First class was Geology and Professor came in disguised as Gorilla Kong and rwarrrrred holding his baby gorilla in one arm and a banana in the other. After, I had Japanese then Marine Biology the Kanji follows.
1. the truth about how they lost their virginity
We cannot and will not support any proposed legislation or movement aimed at curtailing your right to express yourself in an open and democratic environment.
a. No excuses are allowed (Psalm 51:1-6). David made it clear where his sin came from. He was born a sinner. Environmental factors played no role. He was the source of his own sin. That is why he begged for mercy. He could not wipe away the consequences. Neither could he eliminate an already done deed. He needed God to intervene. For God to intervene, David realized that there could be no excuses.
LORD mayoral candidate Katrina Fong Lim has vowed to rid Darwin's streets of itinerants. One of her opponents - rubbish warrior Trevor Jenkins - is homeless.
i wish she knew the beauty trapped with in,
Change…Apt that Beltane came in with a bang.
The gruesome murders, by a group of eight to 10 terrorists, happened at Emmanuel Mission School - 15 km south-east of Umtali and 8 km from the Mozambique border - once used as the Eagle boarding school.
There are some interviews which just find a way to you and work themselves out on their own. Case in point, this one with film and television actor Fred Griffith (Brig. Gen. Robert Rodes, CSA), who upon reading my announcement regarding the Gods and Generals themed trivia contest we will be having here in March, contacted me and offered to donate an autograph for one of the prizes or conduct an interview. Surprised by this generosity, I took him up on both his offers, and here we are, learning of the filming experiences of yet another G & G cast-member. Though he did not have any lines in the film, he had plenty of screen-time and proved to be a tremendous presence working alongside Stephen Lang. Fred told me on Facebook, “Rodes did have lines in the original 250 page script, which I read! Welcome to Hollywood!”
Other goings on include school dances, gymnastics, boxing classes, powerbar classes, dates with the treadmill, high school enrolment meetings (eeek... another one in high school!), drop offs and pick ups here, there and everywhere, haircuts, Orthodontic/shopping visits to Mackay..... and so on and so on! It really is never ending isn't it? :)
So while talking to some collegues today about clever advertising, i decided to share a brilliant article that i came across a couple of days that lists the 26 Brilliant Minimalist Print ads.
After Nick Griffin first publicised the scale of Muslim rape of white girls four years ago he was arrested for hate speech and faced Severn years imprisonment!
go on roll in the tears of orphans
-Diverat Wing, dropped by near Yaston, increase agility a little.
Tell me all about it.
HOPS HOPS HOPS, it's all we get nowadays isn't it?
*Doug is currently with some of the local branch leaders delivering supplies to Hachinohe. Evidently a lot of their resources are being diverted to Sendai so they're running short.
Back to Front
If attending yoga classes can be so beneficial, it follows that by bringing some yoga practices and attitudes to the workplace we can avoid some of the negative effects of workplace stress and a sedentary lifestyle in the first place.
Flashback: Helping a friend’s boyfriend carry her across a street. We each have an arm over one shoulder. She weighs 75 pounds. And is fabulously drunk. He is an economics major. I say, “I will never understand money.” He says, “Then you will never have any.”
Whisk milk, eggs, sugar, vanilla, salt, and cinnamon in large bowl until well blended.
Thanks for reading guys, see you Vader! ~Sonnet
If one book becomes a super-bestseller, then publishers charge like lemmings to copy its success with whatever they have to hand. Take The Da Vinci Code (please). But seriously: how many books in the top 20 were suddenly about codes, grails, holy plots and Knights Templar*? Kate Mosse’s book Labyrinth, which surely took longer to write than The Da Vinci Code, was even accused of copying Dan Brown’s book, as if she had dashed it off in an afternoon after noticing it in WH Smiths. It gets even more ludicrous: Sam Bourne appears to be marketed on the strength of the similarity of his name to Dan Brown.
a bunch of your buddies will gather around and collectively give
If you want to glaze the tart, bring the jelly and water to a boil. Using a pastry brush, or, better yet, a pastry feather (custard is delicate) and a light touch, cover the top of the tart with the hot jelly. If the apples and custard have separated, use the glaze to fill in the cracks. If you are not glazing the tart, just dust the top generously with confectioners' sugar.
She`s A Carioca 02:39
Beyond generally struggling to cook, one of the reasons I have relaxed on my blogging, or relaxed my expectations of myself with blogging, is because I have really wanted to revisit recipe books. For Christmas, my mother-in-law gave me a fantastic book for vegetarian or healthy living families, Feeding the Healthy Vegetarian Family. The author, Ken Haedrich is very laid back and has great suggestions for making meals for families backed with healthiness. Living in New Hampshire, Haedrich developed his vegetarian cooking when he cooked dinners in a group home for children. The home served vegetarian only food, and he quickly learned about how to turn children to love vegetables. After trying a few of his recipes, I can see why.
Dying my tips was relatively easy too. I mainly just followed the tutorial from The Beauty Department. I got all the supplies at Sally Beauty Salon for about $40 and then my friend kindly spent 2 hours working on about 12 different streaks. First, you need to bleach the tips, then wash them out and then put the color on, and you're going to want a few different shades of whatever color you want so that you can get an ombre-esque look. Click here for the full detailed instructions!
A recent study found that replacing harmful carbohydrates — found in processed foods like white rice, white bread, and so on — with foods such as nuts and fatty fish, decreases LDL (“bad cholesterol”) levels and increases those of HDL (“good cholesterol”). The researchers also found that eating foods rich in good fat:
Any other business?
Formerly known as Pleasant Island, Nauru is the world’s smallest island nation, with an estimated 9,300 population in 2010 and covering just 21 square kilometres (8.1 sq mi). Originally settled by Micronesian and Polynesian people, the island was declared an independent state in 1968 after a long history of occupations/administrations by the Germans, British, Japanese and Australians.
The animals will be brought out of sedation before they are transported, Peters said.
My weight has bounced back up into the 170's again - 169 was nice while it lasted. I'll see it again soon.
Thank you for allowing me to share with you my "brotherly love"...I'm opening up the opportunity to you...did the photo above or this post touch you just as much as it did me? Honestly...this is so personal to me...my love for my brother, if you have a sibling...I'm sure it did...feel free to share...would love to hear it.
Geezus Kryst. stop! What happened to living in the now and enjoying the current situation and allowing people to just “be”. In a sense, the continual badgering implies that there is something wrong with your choices and that you ought to get a move on and keep up with the Joneses.
I know it’s causing bondage in me but i have no idea how to get out of it.
Kimo's: Bands hated it because of the stairs, fans hated because, well, I dunno, they'd rather be at the Hemlock? One less rock venue in San Francisco. You didn't love it enough, I hope you're happy fuckers!
The Wish
Think of a carefully selected extra-special tomato seed. Potentially, that little seed can grow 25 pounds of wonderful fruit. One seed will easily produce one million times its weight in good food. But the seed with all its promise won’t grow any tomatoes unless it is planted.
What Edward did next was extraordinary in English history. While Richard II was forced to abdicate, King Charles I was beheaded, and James II and tossed out of England, no King in English history had voluntarily given up their throne. It’s a wonder that hell didn’t freeze over or the Four Horsemen of the Apocalypse didn’t come riding up Pall Mall to the doors of Buckingham Palace.
I decided that running every other day would be the most conducive to my calf healing so I skipped my 5 easy miles run Wednesday and ran my 18 mile long run Thursday. I was really glad I did! The 18 miles went great. No problems with my calf and only a tiny bit sore now (Friday here in Korea). I managed to finish all 18 miles in 3 hours flat, despite the first two miles being very slow as I ran through town to get to the base (Hubby had the car). The temps were from the low 60’s to low 70’s over the course of 3 hours, but there was a wonderful thick fog that kept the sun off me, which is the number one thing that zapps my speed. My last half mile split was 9:01! It felt so great to meet my long run goals and at the end I could have kept going. I am really hopeful for my upcoming marathons and feel much better now that my calf is on the mend.
I have been swamped since I got back from Seattle, so I'm sorry if it's taking me longer to answer e-mails than usual. We are also packing for a large show down in LA that will be happening July 3-6, Anime Expo, so I'm going to also be a bit preoccupied getting ready for that show for the next week, then it's packing for CHA and the Certification Classes in Milwaukee and Chicago. Summer is just sooo busy! Hopefully we'll see some of you this summer at one of our events.
For July I am releasing 3 project kits! I have used the beautiful Green at Heart line by Basic Grey since it has such beautiful summer colors. The 3 scrapbook kits include a double page layout, altered canvas and candle, and a personalized Girls Secrets Journal for the kids! Here are the kit prices-
If the goal is highly complex, special care is needed to ensure that the work/effort doesn’t become too overwhelming. The goal setter needs sufficient time to meet the goal but also enough time to practice or learn what is expected and required for its success. Be patient with yourself and reward each small success until you are ready to move onto the next. By summer’s end I had succeeded in hiking more than 6 hikes by my criteria. However, when the group decided on one hike to go an additional distance and climb higher, I knew I wasn’t ready and so stayed behind with a few others who all knew they were not ready to go further. Although I had succeeded in achieving my original goals I needed more time to train my body, my mind and my endurance level before taking on new goals and hiking to a higher level. The next summer, I successfully set out a new plan of action to hike at an intermediate level. Success eventually came where I could climb 1000 meter plus, at 10k plus distance with no problem.
"You might just as well say," added the March Hare, "that 'I like what I get' is the same thing as 'I get what I like'!"
'Chime' by Franny Billingsley is published by Bloomsbury at £10.99
Your dream bike isn’t always your first bike…but it taught you how to ride!
In time, Jeremy befriends an old man at the post office, another old man who owns a bookstore, and even the Duke Street Boys themselves. But his problems are not at an end, as a war is boiling between the Duke Street Boys and the Mims—a rival gang from across the bridge. As Jeremy becomes the target of the Mims, his friendships, his strength, and even his fearlessness are put to the test.
At 11PM of 9/21,Fukuichi camera showed a crane was leaning over the reactor 3.
It is still not fit to send to agents, producers, managers, publishers, and studio people.
- 3 tbsp sugar
It is Monday again and time for another challenge.
The leading runners were heading back up as we approached the Pleasure Beach and club runners obviously made up the first dozen places or so. But around me I would say the majority were "unattached". Many young men with talent and potential running an occasional race but not in local clubs.
Hiring the catadores to be part of his photography practice—taking them temporarily away from the landfill—is akin to giving a person candy for the first time. On one hand, the experience throws into sharp relief the previous candy-less existence, which can lead to despair. On the other hand, the taste of this sweeter reality can lead to a transformation, the creation of a desire to make such a reality permanent. The worst outcome, however—and this hovers in the background in this film—is that candy isn’t good for the person. The introduction of this troubling element in their lives, in fact, may harm a person who had been quite content.
Although the potential lost revenue is great, the affiliate site points out that The New York Times Online Store coupon for 10% off remains intact
Flour your hands and begin to shape the dough, adding the remaining flour by the tablespoon to keep the dough from sticking when needed. You can knead the dough inside your bowl or onto a floured counter; I usually knead inside the bowl for a few minutes, and when it stops being sticky I turn it out onto the counter. To form or shape the dough, you want to push the heel of your dominant hand (just above your wrist, not your foot) into the dough while turning the dough over with your other hand, repeat for 8-10 minutes until the dough is not sticky and it feels very pliable!
It makes enough juice for about two days, which I seal and refrigerate. It tastes grassy (which I like), then spicy, then the aftertaste is sweet. Yum!
There's no wrong time to sing "Say My Name" in its entirety.
If anyone was to ask me if I am a racist I know what answer I would give. I know what answer I would be expected to give but I’d like to think I would give the right answer because it was true and not simply to prevent getting myself into trouble. But after reading about poor Mel Gibson in this book I’m not so sure how honest I could be. Let me fill you in. I was aware that Mel Gibson had said or done something a while back that had got him into hot water but I didn’t know the specifics. What happened was this:
The Maya have long appreciated and respected that there are other colors, other races, and other spiritual systems. “They know,” he said, “that the destiny of the Mayan world is related to the destiny of the whole world.”
5)
“Leadership today in America has to be about doing the big things and being courageous. That’s what it has to be about. Same thing with health-benefit reform, which is an analogy to Medicaid and Medicare here in Washington. . . . [Don’t think] the public workers in New Jersey hold on any less strongly to the benefits that they get through the government. Teachers in New Jersey . . . pay nothing for their health insurance — nothing — from the day they are hired until the day they qualify for full family medical coverage that costs the state of New Jersey $24,000 per family. [If] you don’t think they’re holding on to that tight — you’re not paying attention. The battles are similar. . . . PCW CEO Barack Obama says the big things are high-speed rail, the big things are high-speed Internet access for almost 80 percent of America or something by some date. One million electric cars on the road by some date. Ladies and gentlemen, that is the candy of American politics. Those are not the big things. Because let me guarantee you something, if we don’t fix the real big things, there are going to be no electric cars on the road. There is going to be no high-speed Internet access, or if there is, you’re not going to be able to afford to get on it. We are not going to be able to care about the niceties of life — the investments that Washington wants to continue to make. That’s not what we need to be talking about. No one is talking about it.
This third grade year was different. She started talking about these girls from the first week. And she's STILL talking about their friendship. In fact each night at family prayer time when it's her turn to say what she's grateful for that day she often mentioned these friends.
16And saying, Alas, alas that great city, that was clothed in fine linen, and purple, and scarlet, and decked with gold, and precious stones, and pearls!
According to Rossouw Cillier the most telling detail is that his brother was unarmed when they attacked. “If we brandish a weapon, we’ll go to prison, not them. What did they gain from this murder? It was an act as pointless as their lives.”
Mary has also released two new stamps that have coordinating dies. They are super awesome, be sure to head to the site and check them out and be sure to check back here to see what I create with them.
How on earth people can be like that?!?! I mean, how can anyone say those things to a person who is crying in desperation and has gone to you for help?
Mennifee Lake
Just another night for Louie in Kensington Brooklyn.
Children of the Ghetto
The lawsuit names five makers of supplements found to contain polychlorinated biphenyl compounds, drugstores CVS and Rite Aid, which sell those products, and Omega Protein Inc., of Houston, which touts itself as the world’s largest producer of omega-3 fish oil.
Two of my favourite things to do are reading and raising money for animal charities so when I received an email from Dogs Trust about Green Metropolis, their charity bookstore, I knew I wanted to get involved.
You may well question why ALEC and its backer need an even more dumbed down populace, since this is the same American electorate who can be convinced of almost anything, even the need to send its sons and daughters off to wars generation after generation. Well. Siouxlou, the wealthy and powerful never think they have enough control over the hooples, any more than they ever think they have enough money.
I pray daily for inspiration while studying the scriptures and the assignments. I am so grateful for a Father in Heaven who listens to prayers and is willing to help me with my class and to understand the scriptures as I read them. I am amazed at the difference this time in reading and studying the scriptures. It almost feels like I am reading them for the first time and it is not by any means.
fallen needles that rain can’t reach
and to me that is the best part!
Now if you've heard any Foo Fighter songs or seen the videos you'd be right in thinking that Dave Grohl is almost as cool as Old Knudsen.
In reading that, I heard an echo say back to me, “Rather than viewing our current ‘circumstances’ as an obstacle to fulfilling our God-given destiny, or ‘as an excuse’ for pulling back from the purposes of God, we need to passionately embrace the life God has given us.”
5. FREE WILL AND TESTAMENT (4:44)
Guillen has the right to love whomever he wants. His affections take no skin from my nose or yours. Hell, I love Nathan Bedford Forrest, Robert E. Lee, Stonewall Jackson and Jeb Stuart. There are others in this country who would be appalled at my affection for these historical figures. However, it's none of their damn business.
Hunter Garrity is used to watching his back. The kids at school sense something different about him. And they’re right.
In 2006, due to my input, a new professional format for leaflets was brought in. The design was upgraded and combined with the selection of a striking and forceful message, in A3 full-colour finish. And at the same time as canvassing we were continuing to work away in the parks, cleaning graffiti, picking up litter and clearing brooks, leaving the perception in people’s minds that we had already been elected and were going about our council work.
and possibly head back to the Med.
Yes, the SNP got the most councillors, but they never came close to taking the prize!
What Would U.S. History Look Like
Linda Ronstadt quite possibly recorded the most popular cover of this song in 1980. My older brother who was 18 at the time, really dug her version, and owned her "Mad Love" album which featured her remake. I however preferred spinning my old man's 1965 45 rpm single of "Hurt so bad" by Little Anthony and the Imperials.
Flames burn down
Aside from feeling depressed, I know that the things I am going through with Jermaine are not easy on my spirit. He came by, unexpectedly, yesterday. I caught him peeking at my phone (text messages, phone calls, facebook) on a few occasions, but it wasn't until I told him how lonely I've been that he let what he was thinking out of the box. I told him that I was wishful. That I wished he was better and had a job and a place, that he was reliable and we could all live together. It's a pipe dream, I know, and it will never happen, but I was sad and that was what I wanted to wish for. He, instead of comforting me or giving me any hope, asked if this had to do with Jacob. He assumes that I am going to be with Jacob since Jacob has a job and a home and a car. He got angry and quiet before telling me as he left that I need to make sure I'm making the right decision (what ever that means).
Catholic stigmatist
"Sure".
G = 5
This year however, surpassed all with the guest speaker being David Osmond, the nephew of Donny and Marie Osmond and a musician in his own right. Indeed, one of my first thoughts was that I needed to get a couple of his CD’s because he really is an amazing performer.
The thing is to the women who rejected “the uncool kid.” You hurt him pretty bad probably and help kill his confidence. Honestly if you turned him down the nice way, like, “Hey guy, you’re a really good person and I like you as a friend, but just don’t want to hurt the friendship or whatever.” That’s the nice small easy way of saying no. To the business man who needs to turn down someone just say, “Honestly person, I am just not interested at the moment, though it’s a very interesting idea or product, we just don’t have the time or funds to invest it right now, but thank you for reaching out to us.”
Quotes straight from Wikipedia.
Nevertheless, twenty-one minutes in and she grew on me. She’s like that. Why couldn’t they get her into Moneyball? I might have enjoyed it more. I know she was gone from Justice-land by then, but maybe she could have had a scene discussing the restraining order. Who am I kidding, nothing can make Justice interesting.
Abigail had her one-year wellness appointment on Friday. She weighs an even 23 lbs and is 28 1/4 inches long. She got 3 shots. She laid so still and was so quiet while the nurse got them ready- then as soon as she got stuck she turned bright red and screamed! Luckily she calmed down as soon as I picked her up :) I gave her Tylenol throughout the day and she did just fine :)
All this makes me think I should’ve just stuck with writing quests (hey, I could DO quests), but earlier this year I made a genre shift from fantasy to SF, and science fiction is a less questy genre than fantasy.
In a post on his blog yesterday regarding the 2012 Arthur C. Clarke Award Nominees, Priest basically beat his chest, whipped it out and urinated all over the nominees, then squatted amidst the mess and defecated upon the soggy pages like a sullen child. I don't think I've ever read such a mean-spirited temper tantrum, and I can't recall the last time an author disgusted me enough to ensure my shelves remain bare of anything he's ever touched.
So the second thing I do when I am at a crossroads
That smile...
Nevertheless perhaps the Orange Coats who have been taking part in some of their greatest hockey louis vuitton online kaufen in franchise record had been knocked off for your 16thstraight in time Knoxville since the Potential predators or innovators obtained 3 times inside the 3 rd to be able to wipe out the Coats 3-2.
The Salvation Army Central Oklahoma Area Command is once again asking citizens to adopt needy children and seniors through its Angel Tree Program. This year the Angel Tree is located on the second floor at Penn Square Mall near The Buckle.
If the sun is shining where you are, - enjoy!. If it's damp and cold, then I just hope that these freebies will bring a bit of sunshine into your life.
on what you like!
The huge attention the Indonesia national team received lately unfortunately came at the moment I believe as one of the lowest point of Indonesian football. You know, the Football Association of Indonesia has been led by Nurdin Halid for over seven years now. And from those years, he spent a couple of years leading this sport organization ridiculously from behind jail bar after being convicted for corruption charges. Don’t ask about the pros and contras of it, yet I’m sick enough to know that such pathetic thing could be happening here in the country where the government always telling their people that they against corruption. How would you believe that a national sport organization which let to be directed such way and the government who let it happened are not corrupted as well?
And it's a blessing.
Have a great week my friends, get to work on your Christmas presents, now, if you haven't already.
1 ga
We have many other enemies, and amongst them some, the most deadly, hate us mostly for the good that we have done.
the year now that we won't
to have a child and parent directed education
Curiosity is not a bad thing in itself. I prefer to think it is a natural way of our brains to work when we’re not sure about something and have questions about a particular thing. I think this is how good scientists have arrived at good theories as well. They start by asking themselves some questions. Then, they try to find answers. In that quest, they establish a hypothesis and plan for effective experiments that will take into account the materials, procedures and data involved. As Gombrich said: “every observation we make is the result of the questions we ask.” (p. 107). In order for our students to be able to reflect on the processes of life, we have to give them the tools, which include time, environment, and thought provoking questions so they can analyze share their findings in class.
It all begins in Spring 1901. Germany has three options to open with. Attack England with French and Russian aid. Attack France with England or Italy. Or attack Russia through Scandinavia and Warsaw. Which choice to take depends on the individual German player, his or her opponents, and their diplomacy prior to Spring ’01. Let’s study each of these attack options in detail.
Forget about hot fixes, register editing and black magic. I even re-installed the whole OS and I got the same problem again! THIS is the quickest and most effective solution to the 99 % CPU usage by SVCHOST.EXE during Microsoft Update procedure. Read on and in 2 minutes you’ll get control on your computer again!
Enjoy the journey…not just the destination:)
The only reason I get to have any sort of adventure in my everyday work is the great team I work with. My colleagues on the Education Team here at FortWhyte - current and past - I've been so lucky to work with you...I mean it. Ed Team forever! Another big thanks is due to all the other staff at FortWhyte Alive... administration, development, site crews, my camp colleagues - we're a jigsaw puzzle, and aren't complete without all the pieces. Also, without the dedicated efforts of a huge volunteer base, FortWhyte Alive would be very much alive at all. Your time, talents, and teaching is something I value deeply. Thank-you.
Scot Meacham Wood - I truly find satisfaction in each of the homes I’ve created. Each project is so collaborative, and so specific to that one client.
It's sort of like: People can't afford so much steak, so they switch to pasta. And then steak is taken out of the "basket of goods" used to figure inflation, and pasta is put in. Because of this change, the inflation rate number is less. This is sick-puppy arithmetic, all of it. And bad economics.
Based on a Buddhist meditation practice, Jon Kabat-Zinn, PhD, at the University of Massachusetts, developed Mindfulness Based Stress Reduction (MBSR), a mediation technique that has successfully reduced physical and psychological symptoms in many medical conditions, including pain syndromes.
Each design is clearly explained with instructions and diagrams in a highly visual way. Alissa gives lots of great and easy to find tips about how to vary the design and also colour value which is really important when working with solids. Unlike some other quilting books, Alissa also gives you 2 ideas for quilting (usually 1 straight line and 1 free motion quilting) for each design so that`s a whopping forty ideas in total!
Start by cutting your Bazzill cardstock to size. I scrap in true A4 size, so I cut mine to 29,7x21 centimetres (cm). Please feel free to adapt to another layout size if you prefer. 8.5x11 or 12x12 would work great for this too.
Summertime of the dead whispered the truth of his joy
An example would be a high school buddy that never grew up. Still doing the same things they did when they graduated 25 years ago. They still stay out late and party. They take issue with anyone who is successful or wants to grow. You know who these people are.
Can you believe it is only ONE WEEK until Thanksgiving??!! Where has the year gone?? I've been having such a wonderful time since I started Buzzin' Balms & Body Essentials - I've learned so much already! I've enjoyed experimenting with different textures as well as different scent combinations! I'm always open to suggestions, requests and everything in between!!
In bowl of stand mixer, cream butter and both sugars until lightened. Add vanilla extract. Beat until blended.
Deputy Prime Minister Muhyiddin Yassin is tight-lipped about the government's reaction to a lawsuit filed by French prosecutors on Malaysia's purchase of Scorpene submarines, which is hit by charges of kickbacks paid.
Delish
Explaining the objectives of the campaigns Mr. V Pushparayan, member of struggle committee told newzfirst.com, “There are two Indias today, the rich and powerful India whose life is deemed to be important and valuable; and the poor and powerless India whose life is condemned as unimportant and dispensable. The dirty ordinary Indians are forced to sacrifice their lives for the holy extraordinary Indians.”
Shi said that the reason Party leaders would want to announce four consensuses such as the above is to take the initiative on its inevitable decline. “The group that has engaged in these massive persecutions of the Chinese people, including the persecution of Falun Gong, is being exposed, and this is deeply implicated with the demise of the CCP. Better that they take the initiative, which will benefit themselves and the world.”
This is the way I drive the car because his plane has landed.
The media in Karnataka have a bigger role in building a narrative of how this ban on dubbing is turning out to be detrimental for the future of Kannada by engaging in debates, discussions involving everyone,most importantly the consumer who holds the purse strings deciding the future of everyone involved.
via
“It’s not like she’s going be turned loose without any care or any way to support herself,” he said, describing frequent outpatient checkups. “She will basically be under the spotlight if she’s ever released.”
The word anniversary means a celebration. For us her death will never be a celebration, it’s still something that hurts. Lisa is our sister. You never get over losing a family member. We love her and we miss her and that isn’t ever going to change.
grapes; steamed
7. Avoid sugar. Fruit is good for you during the day, but too much of any other type of sugar will lead to weight gain. The quick bursts of energy will often leave you tired and craving more and becomes a vicious cycle.
and how she drives me nuts!
32. “If today were the last day of my life, would I want to do what I am about to do today?” -Steve Jobs,
I took Annie to one of the parks in this town this morning. This park has a contingent of people who bring their dogs every single morning to gather and let the dogs play. I've taken Annie there a few times before, but it's been infrequent because I work. So everytime we've gone, Annie has to get used to being around these dogs again.
Some threads on Chloe from a Spinal Injury Forum:
“And that tenant implies so much more, does it not?” Lakosha asked. “It asks us to protect the weak. It asks us to look after children who are left without parents, to protect them from the harshness of the world. To go out and find trouble, and then right those wrongs, to protect the innocent in the world from getting into more harm.”
I'm excited that the people over at Perfect Layers have done their research and have found a shipping option to Canada that is almost half of what they had been charging, making these tools very affordable for everyone!
1/17/2012: Part two.......My ass is pretty damned tender! I don't know if I can stand another spanking tomorrow, but I'm not sure she really cares about that (as well she shouldn't).........lol. I guess I earned what I'm going to get.
ElizabethHahaha, I mean, really? He replied that he was being facetious. Well- I found nothing funny about his lack of concern. I hope he enjoys it when he gets home. No worries- I have more stories about our new neighbors coming soon.
I have one major gripe too, which is kinda contradictory as it is also the reason why I bought these. The Union Jack design is lovely to look at, but horrendously impractical to use. Other than the main shadow colour of the cross in the middle, all the other little sections are simply too tiny for any self-respecting eyeshadow brush or applicator. Even the long and slim end of the included sponge-tip applicators have trouble getting enough colour for a swatch. Imagine the pain I went through just to get decent swatches. And because the shadows are so soft, I ended up digging gouges in some of the thinnest stripes trying to get enough pigments on the applicator.
Again, thank you very much for choosing me to share in your (or whomever’s) money. I look forward to one day lying on a bed with you and throwing it (the money, and maybe the aforementioned Best Maximum Penis medication) in the air so it rains down on us in the classical Hollywood way.
This is absolute nonsense! As far as libraries are concerned, -- since 1994 every single local library in every town, bordering a black township in South Africa, was deliberately and maliciously vandalized by hordes of black pupils. Many of those libraries were restocked with new material, only to be vandalized again and again, until there was nothing left to steal. Later, when public libraries were developed inside the black townships, poor supervision, corruption, and a lack of proper management, rapidly lead to their total deterioration. Hundreds of these new buildings now stand vacant and dilapidated in townships across the country, brilliantly lit up at night by Eskom – at taxpayers expense! Many of these failed projects were paid for by foreign donations. Millions and millions of rands were simply wasted!
~That light fixture! What a stunning centerpiece for the room.
Poem, painting/photography by Dante
Your stepkids may adore you, or they may despise you. It’s beyond terrific when love flows smoothly, and it can be a heartbreak visible from Pluto when you’re on the shit list. Regardless of your status in anyone’s eyes this Mother’s Day, celebrate your awesomeness. This is a tough job, and no one tells you straight what the expectations are. Some days make sense. Other times it feels like you’re neck deep in Shit Creek and the damn boat’s on the bottom. Regardless of the day, week, month, year, or life you’ve had, you’re there, and you’re trying. Take a break from it all and get a massage. You deserve it.
I've also added three gooseberry bushes opposite the blackcurrant bushes at the other end of the strawberry bed. They are young stock, so I'm not expecting much of a harvest this year.
1 here--
In terms of the agreement between the Presidency and a number of national and provincial government departments on the one hand and Vrystaat Landbou (VL, Free State agriculture) on the other, the South African State undertook to pay borderline-farmers for building a new border fence, tp repair a 487km-long border patrol road and to deploy the police on regular patrols in a10km buffer zone.
A strange loneliness was in my heart
The Southern Manufacturing exhibition 2012 housed over 400 manufacturing suppliers, brilliant product design information, fantastic freebies and an excellent hog roast lunch. It wasn’t all food and freebies though, to the technology product designers and engineering lovers this was a Charlie’s Chocolate Factory – sorry, another food reference, no more I promise – plenty of gadgets, the ins and outs of design manufacturing, nuts and bolts everywhere and big heavy machinery. Now, you’re probably wondering what a product designer, like myself, gained from going to the event. It was so interesting to see manufacturing techniques actually used in industry, talking to experts about them and how they could influence my own designs. Of course the best part of my day had little to do with engineering and that was a talk by Stefan Knox of Bang Creations. He touched upon the design process and how you go from a market ready design to a market ready product.
To cure financial ills.
Revelation 9
The effect of How to Get Started is quite fascinating: a sonic representation of the human mind at work. In some ways, however, it's an even more revelatory experience for the performer, who finds him-/herself possibly fighting past his/her previous improvisations in order to be heard, among other possible roadblocks on the way. I, alas, was not one of the lucky audience members picked to do my own performance—but down in Philadelphia, there is an installation devoted to this particular Cage work, one which allows anyone—anyone who makes an appointment beforehand, at least—to record their own realizations. I'm tempted to trek down to Philadelphia just to do this; hey, Ma, I'm performing a work by John Cage!
This can be done but is very unlikely to be done.These things are so unlikely to be done in the foreseeable future that we might as well call them impossible. It would require a veritable social revolution, or a reversal of the revolution that occurred over the past few decades.
WHAT: Press conference Applauding Komen Foundation’s Decision To Continue Distributing Grants to Planned Parenthood
Is this better? What do you think?
5) Set a budget.
While the African Union professes to respect the sovereignty of the individual countries constituting the group, it still has created executive, legislative, and judicial bodies required for regional government, including an African Union Executive Council, a Pan-African Parliament and an African Union Court of Justice.
Psalm 24:9
This time of year brings out the worst in people.
As you already know, I try to give our images a name- mainly so that it's easier for me to identify and remember. It also gives me a chance to name them after friends and family or just names that I like. Kenichi is the name of one of our friend's sons who is still a toddler. Kenichi looks like a young boy, so I thought it matched him.
And that's it. Sorry, I am not considering paper queries or submissions and will not ever again do so.
This is the basic "race game." The board might be marked with obstacles that make a person move backwards, with spaces that vault a person ahead or with alternative paths one can take only if you land on a certain square.
Please fade away. Please die.
There are times when He seems to answer “no” or at least “not now.” It is here, where our desires intersect His will, that we have to trust the Father knows best and every gift comes from Him. Every time, in His time, the gift is good and perfect.
For someone I never knew.
They want to take something from you in order to gain something for themselves.
The rational part of my mind KNEW that this was somewhat typical for a 30-weeker. My friend Angie had told me that young babies tend to fail the nonstress test. She's smart and experienced and well-informed and I totally trust her opinion. And YET, it was freaking me out.
The victim, a Class IX student, was returning from school when she was abducted by one Rajaram who allegedly raped her and left her at an isolated place. Later, the girl after reaching home set herself on fire.
2. When he and new wife moved from Indiana to Arizona they were involved in a near-fatal car wreck. My mother never did a thing to help or contact them when it happened. (I had no clue that it had happened).
It’s cause and effect right (literally) at your fingertips. It’s empowering because it gives you control and power over your own body – you’re in charge of what you put in your mouth and the test results reflect that (whether or not you want to take responsibility is another issue).
He is 10. I get an instant ophthalmic migraine.
As liberally as to thy midwife show
“Uhh…you—“
Else can see, else can hear,
I had a meeting at Playwriting Australia today as I am undertaking a rehearsal room internship with them over the next two weeks for their National Script Workshop. I started reading one of the plays that will be workshopped.
“She must have her tits screwed on,” he remarked.
And at intervals waiting or in the midst of camp,
When thinking about starting an online store, or selling products or services online, one might want to figure out which products are bringing in the cash. I've been experimenting with selling on eBay. I've only sold clothes and shoes, but wanted to find out what products would bring in more money.
Woven in with the present-day story of the three women is Mala's own story, which I really loved. I wasn't quite as involved in the stories of the three suburbanites, as their characters weren't as developed, but Mala's story was fabulous. I wanted much more of her story! But the three modern-day women did have intriguing stories, and I read eagerly each night for the resolution of each.
We are planning a great white christmas Scandinavian rail adventure but thats not for ages yet.
Size: 196,369 acres
that of autos) 24.9 64.1
Monica accepts his offer against her better judgment, knowing the rumors of Sean and his womanizing ways. She tells herself that she’s doing this for Roman – that she can avoid her new, sexy, summer boss – his chiseled chest, pretty green eyes and charm that just won’t quit. But after only a few weeks, Monica finds it a struggle to keep her eyes off of Sean. Can she handle staying focused on her babysitting gig for three months without being swept off of her feet by Milwaukee’s finest? Or is Sean’s game too much for the young, conservative teacher to handle?
At last he decided to drive a few miles away, turn right, then left, past the bridge, then right again and
3: After joining a group for the sale and trade of slings, I bought a new, more supportive, Mei Tai. It was a SnugBaby. The straps were padded and it was much more comfortable. My only gripe with it is that the piece of material that supports the baby’s bottom is a little thin, and Nookie’s legs started to dangle down a little too much for my liking as she grew.
Megrahi update: “As 2010 comes to an end, with tales of Mr Megrahi’s imminent demise apparently somewhat exaggerated, time for an update on the rush of other stories on the subject that became public during December 2010……”
It’s come to my attention that T may need some help meeting kids his own age. He’s very social, always attentive to what’s going on around him, makes eye contact, and can hold his own in “conversation.” We never really worried about finding playmates because we bring him with us almost everywhere and he’s exposed to a diverse network of people, places and events. Then a few weeks ago I caught him running to the door “wo-wo”ing in unison with our barking dogs when Daddy came home. A few days later I noticed him playing tug-of-war with a stuffed animal dog-style, shaking it around in his teeth. At this rate, the first day of kindergarten will be filled with some pretty embarrassing questions.
YAYYYYYYYYYYY!!!!
So what do I have in my tank bag?
When the team arrived on Corn island, (about a 20 minute helicopter ride), they found out there might be some old barracks in which they could set up.
Hope the New Year brings you lots of good health, happiness and love.
But this punishment had been on the agenda for weeks--ever since I'd lost track of how much homework I had and spent a painful night working on a paper and a presentation and getting only two hours of sleep. That had been "unacceptable" and a punishment was in order.
Read any blog and you will see... the madness is spreading quickly. As far as I know their is no cure or antivirus that will stop the madness. So... I guess what one cannot avoid one must learn to embrace!
- Digital self-publishing: Alex Adsett offers some good advice on the pitfalls of digital self-publishing. Turns out e-retailers are being a wee bit sneaky. D Publishing locks authors into 10-year terms which can change at their discretion. WTF. Apple’s iBooks Author is a handy tool that allows authors to use Apple software to make illustrated e-books. Could be of use to my major project but Apple’s terms of service stipulates the author can only sell through the Apple iStore. Not ideal.
I love creating 'colorways' of fabric to create my patchwork. My patchwork camera strap slipcovers have been my best seller since they were first introduced ... and ... the compliment I get the most is my pairings of color/fabric. It now seemed obvious.
1 insulting
I left India again in 1971….for Europe, where I stayed, as you know, with Ingrid in Berlin, and later, opened a Pantomime School also. But that I closed in 1995 and after some time also stopped performing. Now from time to time I get offers to act in small roles in German TV and Films.
We have each other.
I have been stalking Becky Higgins website for
Tsheounyani spent the weekend in the Krugersdorp police station's holding cells.
- "give mama a kiss" - you know this phrase and will give me a big kiss
I liked what I had, but then I decided to take another angle. I used some Graphics Fairy royalty free antique clipart, http://graphicsfairy.blogspot.com/--a dress form, some antique shoes, a lilly of the valley plant in a pot, an Marie Antoinette style woman, and a hand holding a rose. I changed the color to be limey on all the clipart except the hand holding the rose. It looked okay, but seemed not quite finished, so I put the blockprints and words behind the photoshop woman that I had constructed. After I printed the ATCs on cardstock,the design still needed something, so I decided to embellish it with lime stitching--a straight stitch and a zig zag.
Got to get some yoga in!
"Grey's unique series of 21 life-sized paintings, the Sacred Mirrors (on display at the Chapel of Sacred Mirrors in Wappingers Falls, NY), takes the viewer on a journey toward their own divine nature by examining, in detail, the body, mind, and spirit. The Sacred Mirrors present the physical and subtle anatomy of an individual in the context of cosmic, biological and technological evolution. Begun in 1979, the series took a period of ten years to complete. It was during this period that he developed his depictions of the human body that "x-ray" the multiple layers of reality, and reveal the interplay of anatomical and spiritual forces. After painting the Sacred Mirrors, he applied this multidimensional perspective to such archetypal human experiences as praying, meditation, kissing, copulating, pregnancy, birth, nursing and dying. Grey’s recent work has explored the subject of consciousness from the perspective of "universal beings" whose bodies are grids of fire, eyes and infinite galactic swirls."
I agree with Sam that drawing skills can be useful to an engineer (or anyone), but my own drawing skills are awful, and I did not find Drawing on the Right Side of the Brain very helpful (I had the “classic edition, not the new one). I did a few of the exercises, but could not maintain the practice for very long, and my drawing skills remain at nearly useless level. I have always had a poor visual memory and poor hand-eye coordination, so most of the exercises are extremely difficult and frustrating for me. Other people may be more successful than me, either from having greater perseverance or less handicap to overcome.
As with any large and diverse museum, you’ll want to pace yourself. It is OK if you don’t hit every single exhibit. Take time to read up on the temporary exhibits they have up and see if those would be of interest, when the “Nature’s Best Photography” exhibit is around it is really show-stopping, but could be easy to miss because it isn’t as well known. Let your kids be your guide in this museum and see what you all discover!
I responded,
Mr Brayshaw said he was told to burn the shredded documents, but kept them because he felt something improper had taken place.
Landon did great in school and was well behaved. He came home raving about his kind teachers Miss Kathy and Miss Shirley and said he had such a fun day. What a relief! On one hand I am so sad he is growing up so quickly, on the other I am so thankful he has found his confidence and there were no tears today! I can't wait to see everything Landon learns in this new program, I know this year will fly by!
Kenneth Branagh and Emma Thompson are always reliably good in theater-driven stuff. Judi Dench directs, but it's a limited, anemic direction, still speaking theater language when it should be speaking movie.
These are a few of my new favorite things
Your eyes jerk down and you realize you are standing on a piece of wood- probably two inches thick. It covers the floor and that’s when you know that you are about two inches away from plunging to your death.
All the things
Sam Solomon’s book about Islamic immigration into the West and Jihad, called the Trojan Horse, describes the jihadist ideology behind mass Muslim migration. The liberal/left denounce it of course, but the Islamists are well aware of the effectiveness of infiltration. Abu Baseer, is a London based spiritual adviser to Ansar ul-Islam, a jihadist organisation. He had this to say about Islamic immigration to the West. Quote:
1:24 easy run (c. 7.5 mi.)
If you have decided that the target audience is girls between the ages 15-17 living in Urban areas, what is the message that will resonate with this group? Remember, don’t lie, even unintentionally to make your story sound like something it’s not. If the message of the cover design is not the same as the message in the book you’ll get caught and people will feel cheated. Your reader won’t trust you after that.
If you’re in the StL metro or surrounding areas, this group is doing a free workshop about all this on 2/27 in O’Fallon, MO. Let me know if you want more details. braskasmom atgmail. com
Colin D. Smith has generously bestowed the Liebster Blog Award upon The Feather and the Rose! Hoorah!
So here's a question for those of you who write: is it pleasure or pain, agony or ecstasy?
Malema, through his spokesperson, Floyd Shivambu, refused to comment, saying he would not ­respond to questions from this ­reporter.
The place is fresh and feminine, accented with Tiffany blue accessories and chandeliers.
“It is my dream to create an art which is filled with balance, purity and calmness, freed from a subject matter that is disconcerting or too attention-seeking. In my paintings, I wish to create a spiritual remedy, similar to a comfortable armchair which provides rest from physical expectation for the spiritually working, the businessman as well as the artist.”
And so, the miles fell away, the last five in pouring rain. En route, we were passed by only two people - both of whom had strides that would not have disgraced a Roman centurian. I am sure my aching legs held us back but, nevertheless, we completed the 15 miles in a little under 3 hours 45 minutes.
For Warmaster. I said I put 8 figures to a stand. For skirmishing infantry I´d like about 6 or so. Same as before, just build your filler bases, put them anywhere to maintain the stand original measurements, and you are done. You can even put 5 figures with another filler, representing very spread infantry. Ok ok, the “mass combat effect” of Warmaster goes through the window, but I have 28mm figures. I´d love to get a huge amount of 6mm (yeah, I´m a 6mm fan) ancients to play proper Warmaster, but you gotta do with what you have.
iPods & MP3 players
Gadianton Robbers: “In the Book of Mormon, a band of robbers founded by a wicked Nephite named Gadianton. Their organization was based on secrecy and satanic oaths.” (Note: Secrecy and oaths are good things if they’re not satanic.)
Last Friday was a day to cherish for rest of my life. The mommy and daughter day turned out to be more than just perfect. We woke up around 8am, jumped into morning routine, had breakfast and got ready by 10:30am. We reserved our car for the day as you know we had many many important commitments for the day. So many places to cover in one single day. I wanted to visit all the art and craft places and studios I have shortlisted from internet to see if we can celebrate Adi’s birthday (that’s a month away) in one of that place. The theme for this year’s birthday would be arts and crafts as the girl is now more inclined towards it. What better day to check the places than Friday where we don’t have to unnecessarily test M’s patience by visiting numerous places on the same day, give the girl a chance to choose the place she likes and allow us to take our own time at every stop again without testing M’s patience.
“You don’t need more time, you just need to decide” – Seth Godin
--Pedulla Ceramic Tile
The event is only being held at certain venues in the greater Phoenix area this coming Friday but you can find a list of participating watering holes at the Arizona Strings website.
Bubba exclaimed, "Really? I can't believe you didn't enjoy that."
Pubs can still do well, but it really is about the offer.
I’m not sorry I met you
Start with a 10" x 7" piece of beige cardstock and score at the 5" mark to create a 5" x 7" card base. Next adhere a 5" x 6" piece of yellow cardstock to the card front, then on top of that a 4 3/4" x 5 3/4" piece of violet cardstock and then on top of that a 4 1/2" x 5 1/2" piece of pink cardstock. Next with Walnut Stain Distress Ink on Cryogen White paper stamp the Bella Rose Vintage Background. Color with Copics. Cut image to 4 1/4" x 5 1/4" and matte on pink cardstock. Add pink Zva Crystals to center of flowers. Add Faux Pearls and Pink Crystals to top of card front.
2006: V&A Illustration Awards (shortlisted)
On the subject - Warwickshire based but with a truly global reach via their distribution network, the 'own-brewed' beers of this company look set to become well known fixtures on supermarket shelves worldwide.
I am slowly regaining control over the mess in our house,
emerie was jumping in her bed.
May 03 1:45 AM
And they seem to be considering me
For what it is worth, you can look up TACOM's press release where it claims that "Soldier's use chemicals that may react with polymer magazines" without explaining how those same chemicals don't react to the nylon on our rucksacks with plastic frames, polymer furniture on the M4/M16, and even the Vibram soles of our boots. This is a cheap excuse and the grunts know it. TACOM also says "exit polls from units departing theater continually rate the M4 as a reliable weapon" when asked why the hell they canceled the XM8, HK416 and FN SCAR programs.
Country: Canada/America
I only apply that description to the supposed people of Attoe’s aesthetic because of the overtones of the gallery suggest it -- the clichéd eagle poised to strike with WAR emblazoned above it, the vulnerable comment, or a naked angel saying “you have had it too easy.” The words, at least textually, are a slight on those liberal art people, full of complaints but not of action.
I love my daughter, she is amazing, gorgeous, smart as hell and she deserves me to be the mom she needs...
chiasmus press is slowly unfurling out of hiatus. we have a big idea about our reincarnation and we want you.
pay for abortion pills?
We now know Lyndon Johnson was far worse than he is presented in current biographies. Far beyond ballot stuffing, bribery, massive under-the-table kickbacks, and being a consummate and pathological liar, Lyndon Johnson was murdering a lot of people in Texas to cover up his eye popping corruption. A prime example is the murder of US agricultural official Henry Marshall in June, 1961, and who then Vice President Lyndon Johnson arranged to have murdered. In the 1980’s, Billie Sol Estes, a close and corrupt partner of LBJ, began confessing to the murders that he, Lyndon Johnson, Cliff Carter and LBJ’s personal hit man Malcolm Wallace committed. Lyndon Johnson, a manic depressive – and at times a barely functioning psychopath – murdered perhaps 10-20 people to avoid exposure before he got his knife wet with John Kennedy’s blood.
convinced myself
And now, for some Richard Armitage.
107. Play Misty For Me
Thanks so very much for so many kind wishes and thoughts. I thought I'd be brave and let my bump make a guest appearance. A lassie or laddie? No idea. At the moment (28 weeks) I'd say a washing machine...on full spin.
My first Lager! I used naturally soft water, fresh MN snow collected from my front garden where the snow was fresh and untouched. Should be a unique Lager. I also did my first protein rest.
Two Girls, Fat and Thin- Mary Gaitskill (p)
Near the end of the day, Lefty and I lamented that many Japanese brewers are now retrenching, scaling back on their more adventuresome and experimental beers, and settling for milder lineups. The once wonderful Minoh WIPA has not been really tasty for at least a year; Ise Kadoya's Imperial Red seems to be much tamer than what they offered at the Kyoto Beer Fest. Perhaps these brewers are reacting to popular taste and focusing on their best-selling and least flavorful brews. And, my word, just look at how popular Johana's absurd light pink and blue happoshu beers have been at festivals.
Also, there are 3 more days to enter the NuNatural's stevia giveaway! PLEASE enter HERE if you haven't. You have the chance to win such a great product and will be able to start trying it in some low-to-no-sugar recipes for the holiday or new year.
Between my two showers there was only a small handful of things that we actually had to go out and buy. So, this week we got all the last minute things that we need, have washed clothes ( I love the way Dreft smells), organized the nursery and put things away. All of this last minute nesting has been such a blessing but has stirred up many emotions in our house. There were a lot of things that we had purchased or received as gifts for Harper that we never got around to washing, folding or putting away with care in a nursery that was initially prepared for her. So as good (GREAT!!) as it feels to be prepping for Pooh, there is still plenty of grieving for all of things that we missed out on with her big sister. The complexity of emotions is amazing to me, so happy and sad all at the same time but still so incredibly blessed.
Here's how Australian designer Lyn Gardener showcases her beloved Penguins. I've had the good fortune of staying in her beautiful country getaway, The White House at Daylesford. I could have moved into this particular room.
For years, millions have struggled fruitlessly to attain this prize, knowing only that the riddles are based in the culture of the late twentieth century. And then Wade stumbles onto the key to the first puzzle.
Michael J. Akers, 39 South St, Rockport, MA, age 21, arrested for noise
The image to the left contains two years of data points for a random, anonymous seventh grade student, as measured by a web-based reading comprehension assessment. The four green data points represent testing dates. The first data point is the beginning of sixth grade, the second data point is the end of sixth grade, the third data point is the beginning of seventh grade, and the fourth data point is the end of seventh grade. The interval between data points one and two track the reading growth during sixth grade. The interval between data points three and four do the same for seventh grade. Both intervals show growth, as indicated by the upward slope of the line. However, the graph does contain one segment, during which a regression appears to occur.
And now for Hawaian beer
Bernadette welcomes her back to the campus, then gives her a gift. The gift turns out to be the roll of film they had taken at Cabrini Green. Bernie also tells her that a publisher has expressed an interest in publishing her findings.
Sauté pork tenderloin in a pot and add all the ingredients except saffron, cornstarch and pomegranate.
please pray for our health. i have been battling a nasty sinus infection for the past couple of weeks and i think it's finally on it's way out. please pray that it is. i don't want a yucky head cold slowing me down. continue to pray for the many people involved in this trip, both those going and those remaining here. i know, from first hand experience, that the worst side is being at home while your loved one is away. this is the first time that i will be the one away, and i pray for peace for those who are here waiting on my return. obviously stephen, but also other family as well. pray for jarred and amanda who will be loving on him while we're gone. pray for our parents as they are concerned for their children. and the grandparents, aunts, uncles, brothers and sisters who all care about us. i pray that they understand God's sovereign plan for all of our lives, the passionate hearts that God has placed in us and the desire of our hearts for stephen to capture that passion as well.
I enjoyed Webster’s style of writing and I’m looking forward to reading Cámara’s next outing in “A Death in Valencia”.
Looking forward to: My appointment tomorrow!! Hopefully we will get to see Little Bit again!
Let me show you how this thing'll shape up. Shall we?
and cherry pies. cherries are so good this time of year and remind of my father. i think i have to have a cherry pie this weekend.
#27. Thankful for heated seats in my car!
Spoon the apple jam into your jars.Screw the lids on the jars, put all the jars in an oven tray in the now warmed up oven.Fill the tray with the jam-jars up to 2 centimeters with the boiling water.
I've shared my thoughts on The Hunger Games movie in a few places over at 5 Minutes for Books (including posting two interviews with the producer Nina Jacobson), and I hope you'll check out those posts, linked here within, but it's definitely been an experience.
...and the birthday hat becomes a Santa hat - just change the colors and add a tail - VOILA!!
I cry many times every day, from grief and fear and sympathy and exhaustion.
It doesn’t have to be an all-or-nothing commitment. You can start small and gain confidence on trails and side streets, as Hutchings did. Look into provincial cycling laws to find out how to conduct yourself as a rider, and as a motorist around riders.
Our meal plan begins at the Farmer's Market on Saturday mornings. Farmer's Markets are a great way to support community farmers and purchase pesticide-free produce without spending a lot of money! We usually spend between $10-12 dollars a week for four to five fruits and vegetables that we will incorporate into our meals that week. For example, this week our haul included asparagus, cucumber, green onions and green beans all for $8. The week before that was green peas, zucchini and yellow squash, radishes and beets for around $13. We could spend WAY more at the Farmer's Market every week (and usually I really want to!) but with one income to speak of at the moment, we try to keep our costs as low as possible.
I've tried a few of these, using Lacey Townsend, the world-class sniper Heroine in my upcoming Romantic Suspense novel. However, since I don't actually have the book on sale yet, it's kind of hard to document whether or not my method's working. I do get a lot of click-throughs to the blog to read the free snippet / excerpt that I link from these tweets.
Creating a design for a living room in a NJ waterfront apartment was a great challenge and fun experience. My client is a busy professional single woman looking for a complete update in her new apartment. She wanted to incorporate certain colors lilac and soft blues and also wanted to keep her beautiful armoire that is a cherished possession. She had already begun the design by purchasing the Milo Sofa in cream from Macy's, so with the armoire and sofa already in the mix, my challenge was creating a design using traditional and contemporary pieces. Here are some photos of her apartment when I met with her for the first time!
Chaplin develops a similar dynamic with the character of the millionaire (Harry Myers) who the Tramp befriends by saving the distraught rich man from killing himself over his divorce, in a very funny and fluidly paced slapstick scene in which the two men not only repeatedly fall into the water, but more importantly, continually teeter on the edge of falling in. (Chaplin knows well that so much of comedy is about restraint and teasing, as when he has the Tramp continually stepping just to the edge of a hole that opens up in the sidewalk, unseen, behind him. We expect the Tramp to fall in but somehow it's even funnier that he doesn't, at least not right away.) The Tramp and the rich man provide another of the film's allegories on wealth, because when the rich man is drunk, he considers the Tramp his best friend for saving him, but whenever he sobers up, he completely forgets about the homeless wanderer who'd rescued him. Thus he alternates between embracing the Tramp as a friend and ordering his servants to kick Chaplin out of his mansion, which the snooty servants very eagerly do.
end up what people
USHA MARTIN EDUCATION & SOLUTIONS LIMITED Press Release
Sorry it's dark...
Apart from LFOs, you'll also find envelope generators. These produce a curve that 'plays' every time you hit a key.
Daddy says, it is usually said flowers fade, stories end, he said but there is someone here tonight, your testimony will never end.
As many already know, human rights lawyer N.Surendran was recently appointed as a PKR vice president. Below is his statement, reproduced verbatim, except for minor typo corrections.
I’m not typically a web-series type of guy, but I gave this one a shot and liked it. I’m waiting to hear back from the creators in regards to episode #2, but in the meantime view the existing episodes here.
Sitting outside
Point taken: Would the parents responsible for constructing the “Mrs. Green-Burger” effigy promptly remove it from school property?
The loss to City highlighted not only the strength of Mancini’s side but the problem Ferguson has within his squad. This summer will test his faith once more – will he give Cleverly, Anderson and Fletcher the chance to lay claim to Scholes’ position? Or will Ferguson finally snap up the world-class midfielder every transfer window threatens to deliver?
In 2007, when I got my Workman's Comp settlement, I bought her an embroidery sewing machine for her birthday that she wanted so very much. She took the classes, but has yet to use it. I've knitted her two pairs of socks, a pair of leg warmers and cowl since then and she uses those every winter. Therefore, I make sure her gifts are all of the knitted kind from now on.
PS: Shout out....to Hakeen
AEIFD Blog (aeifdblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Ask yourself: what price do you pay to get there… that is IF you are there in the first place… and are you seen where customers are looking for your products and services?
The image is a Stampin Up one. I glued dew drop beads
But that doesn't stop me from playing with the words of others, and one of my favourite ways of doing that is via the wonderfully inventive medium of on-line machine translation. This particular game is easy to play. Simply take a well known verse, for example the opening lines of that splendid song, "Danny Boy". Take those lines and feed them into one of the many free, on-line translation sites (for example Google Translate). Translate them from English to Chinese, then from Chinese to Yiddish, from Yiddish to Hindi, Hindi to Japanese, and then finally back from Japanese to English. What you come up with is a kind of psychedelic anthem, a surrealistic ballad, an odd Irish Air.
15. Spoonful (Dixon) 11:49
I reviewed Hesper Payne before, praising their attention to album art, craft, and originality, but lamenting their weak production job. New EP The Strange Tale of Samuel Gonzalez is more of the same. You'll still find doom with threads of Acid Bath and Nile, blended beautifully into a coherent and distinctive style, but you'll wish they had someone else twiddling their knobs, so to speak. I give it 4 out of 5 stars. This is another name-your-price one, so you'll want to be checking it out forthwith.
I know, I know. Gross looking. I think, for me, if the green chili peppers were not in this recipe, I would have liked it more. So I probably will not be making this again. But it worked for that day.
Preheat your oven to 350 degrees, and grease a 9x13 inch baking dish. Set aside.
So, can someone tell me what is the big deal about “not” wanting to take a bath? Oh my God, it seems that every time bath time comes up on our house it’s always up for discussion and I end up having panic attacks, my blood pressure goes, I’ve got headaches because my now 16 year old daughter wants to debate the issue every single time when in fact, it would save both us the stress, the screaming back and forth and the tears if she’d just do what “she” knows she is supposed to do rather than having me come off looking like the bad guy because I’m pulling her away from what she is doing which she’s made it up in her mind that what she’s doing is more important than what I’m asking.
_ You can spend time at Linden, or you can work from your own home.
I don't just mean that suffering is the consequence of obedient missions. I mean that suffering is one of Christ's strategies for the success of his mission.
These animals become interesting when Stiegler calls for a new political economy and reviews several ways of overcoming tendential decline of profit rate, leading to a discussion of bears: In the nineteenth century the rate of profit was maintained by secularisation of belief via calculable science and technique, the new social projects of schooling, nationalism, health etc., progressively exported globally (on the back of astonishing violence); then in the twentieth century, by means of consumerism and capture of protentions through channelling of attention by way of new media, ‘psychotechnologies’ and service industry-entertainment industry expansion. To this would need to be added colonial markets, imperialism, war and the mining, metals, industrial agriculture, war and the arms trade, plus financial services.
TROY BAR, 10 HOXTON ST, N1 6NG
We're trying to wrest our two-year-old son away from the chokehold that sweet little Miss Dora the Explorer has on him and instead popped in Disney's Fantasia as the Saturday night, after-bath flick. He wasn't too keen, but our five-year-old daughter was pumped. Fantasia is a favorite from her youthful days, and she insisted that my husband go back to first scene, the one with the all the colors, after he had skipped ahead to entice Mason with the flying whales.
“And then, just a few months later, I shared at a public forum in Omaha regarding the sin of homosexuality, and you go from hero to goat,” he accounts. “It just reminds me that as a Christian, we’re not here to just save our lives, and after Penn State, for example, just to play it safe and keep getting the applause of men. We’re not here to save our lives; we’re here to lose our lives for the sake of the gospel.”
No more sorrow, no more pain
Congratulations, Jaime and Peter! All the best to both of you and hope to see you again here in Hawai`i or in Vancouver!
He went on to say,” I would never tell the voters this, but I am telling my supporters this, and once I am elected to the office of President I will make it my goal to shut down HUD entirely and emmerge the Dept. of education into another Dept. without closing it entirely.” “This information is to remain secret as I have found out that to tell the truth does not pay.” At this same fundraiser he promised that he would lower the taxes on the wealthy by another 5 trillion dollars. Of course to do this only adds 5 trillion dollars more to the deficit.
(This view could be yours, too, for $5k a night.)
December has arrived, which means it's time to once again look back on the past year and pick your favorite vampire movie, TV series, and web series.
Frankly, this is madness.
“Did I?” Did I come before the lights went out?”
The Excess Winter Deaths total is a record of how many more deaths there are during winter months compared with the non-winter months.
The Kestenbaums wanted to build condominiums on the site, either with a tower or a large rooftop addition, plans that would have been impossible if the structure had been made a landmark. J.M.H.’s rental plans, by contrast, are not impeded by preserving the building.
Wallechinsky
But for his notorious trial, the beer once known as “black cork” might be altogether forgotten.
It’s amazing how poorly graphically and technically the game has aged, but the story, emotional connection, excellent sound plus voice acting, and the neo-noir atmosphere still radiate with me to this day. A good story can stand the test of time. It’s worth going back and playing.
10:04 a.m. — 1 pound flaked oats into oven on a sheet pan.
* missing vibrate part
2) Salome - Terminal
1 mastery
Test 1: YESTERDAY
If you think you might have fallen into the trap of obsessive passion, go through this list and ask yourself: Do I agree with any of the harmful thought patterns?
or would that beauty melt into a used, lying, under-handed, deceptive harlot
Oh, and that’ll be 50 bucks. What…you thought this was free? Why do you think we never kiss you? It’s just business, guys. Sheesh.
We have some Outstanding Contributors and I can't wait to share their products with you!
It is very rich and the cream and the salty nuts on top are just perfect.
I went and got myself a
Canadian judge knocks claims by SA 'refugee'
Owen: Thanks for having me here, Renee and Stacey. I do love Charlotte. I loved her from the first time I saw her and I just knew that I was going to marry that girl. I couldn't tell you exactly what it is about her, except that when I'm around her, I feel like myself. Charlotte makes me a better man and I hope I make her a better woman... I think I do.
Well, as I said, I loved it. Great voice. I would have said I don't like third person present tense, but it's absolutely right for this book. The language is simple and slightly staccato, but the prose is so well-formed it pulls you along quickly. The viewpoint is omniscient, we are hovering over the action, knowing everyone's thoughts, being given hints all through that tiny actions and decisions the characters make now are going to have unguessable and far-reaching consequences for them.
Your first bite is like a texture and flavor explosion! The crunch and sweet taste of buttery and cinnamon spiced graham crackers....then the smooth richness of a delectable chocolate cream. My, oh my. Take it a step further and top it with a cloud of lightly sweetened whipped cream. Yes, folks - we have a winner.
A double whammy of awesome? I wanted to pick only one Terry Gilliam movie and his most fantastical adventure comes from “The Adventures of Baron Munchausen” (with 1981′s “Time Bandits” a close second), but once I decided on Munchausen that opened up another problem: I love Karel Zeman’s Czechoslovak version just as much so “The Fabulous Baron Munchausen” (aka “Baron Prásil”) ties with Gilliam’s film. Sorry, original 1943 German version. Both Gilliam and Zeman were amazingly visual artists in the realm of fantasy and both have extremely distinct styles and tones, so both films are wonderful and inventive but in different ways. Gilliam’s “Munchausen” features John Neville as the eponymous Baron going on a great journey to find his old friends and rescue a besieged town from invading Turks. The Baron enters his own story and, joined by a little girl (Sarah Polley), he flies a hot air balloon to the moon where he saves the impossibly fast Berthold (Eric Idle) from the zany King of the Moon (Robin Williams). From there they fall into the volcano of Mont Etna where Vulcan (Oliver Reed) and Venus (Uma Thurman) treat them to a tension-filled tea break and floating waltz. Then they are tossed into a whirlpool and are swallowed by a sea monster on the opposite side of the world. Famous for being one of the biggest flops in movie history, the film is in fact a staggering achievement from a technical standpoint and for humor-filled fantasy films as well. Karel Zeman’s version is incredibly stylized and psychedelic. His special effects may be older, but they are no less baffling or impressive. An astronaut lands on the moon only to discover the Baron, who has been there for quite some time. Together they go back to earth for one crazy adventure after another as they fight the Turks and each other for the attentions of the Princess. The movie is a wonderful satirical, innovative, and a visual treat for fantasy lovers of all ages. The “Munchausens” are fantasy untethered.
The Government has now published its prospectus for the Weekly Collection Support Scheme, through which authorities involved in both the collection and disposal of recyclable and residual waste will be able to apply for a share of a total of £250 million of grants.
The Waste Land of the title is Jardim Gramacho, the "Garbage Garden," world's largest garbage dump, and the setting for one of the most touching ruminations on relationship between art, artist, subject and society that I've ever seen.
Fattoush salad typically combines summer veggies, a whack-load of fresh herbs, fried pita bread, and za’atar – a sesame and sumac-based topping that gives fattoush its distinctive zingy flavour. As a dish it is totally fresh and satisfying, perfect for a light, summer afternoon lunch, but can easily be made into a meal with the addition of chickpeas or beans, and maybe a few olives thrown in for good measure. I would liken fattoush to Greek salad, but the thing that really sets it apart is the za’atar – almost like a magical genie-in-a-bottle!
See those scissors right there in front of my beautiful new PINK sewing machine? Those are the dullest paper scissors you'll ever see. I didn't even use a rotary cutter on this stuff (until later)! More sewing. And cutting up. And sewing together again.
But what I don’t understand is how it can be that it doesn’t take faith to believe the universe came from nothing with no cause, and nonliving became living randomly without any help.
Are Christians commanded to be fruitful? Are we to be productive in the Kingdom of God? Carefully read the passage I placed at the top of this post. In v1 our Lord Jesus tells us that He is the vine and that His Father is the vinedresser. In v2 He makes it clear that there will always be professing Christians who are not genuine. How do we know this? They bear no fruit at all. They are lifeless branches that are taken away and burned. A person who does not bear fruit is not a true believer and will one day be taken away to an eternity in Hell. Here is v2 from the Greek: πᾶν κλῆμα ἐν ἐμοὶ μὴ φέρον καρπόν, αἴρει αὐτό, καὶ πᾶν τὸ καρπὸν φέρον, καθαίρει αὐτὸ, ἵνα πλείονα καρπὸν φέρῃ. The word used here that is translated as “bear” is φέρον the present active participle version of φέρω or pherō̄. In other words this is talking about continuous or repeated action. Branches who bear no fruit (μὴ φέρον καρπόν), are so as a way of life. On the other hand, our Lord says that genuine branches in the vine who do bear fruit (καρπὸν φέρον) do so as a way of life and he adds that the Father prunes them in order to make them even more fruitful. Then, in vv5 and 8 we read that some branches will produce “much fruit.” In other words, some believers will be exceptionally more fruitful than others, but all genuine believers will be fruitful. How can we reach this “much more fruitful” level?
That’s right: The last class on the schedule in an Intercollegiate Horse Show Association (IHSA) or an Intercollegiate Dressage Association (IDA) meet is for beginner riders who have had at most a year of riding instruction and may never have previously competed at a horse show before. So the win – or loss – of the entire team comes down to the abilities of the least expert rider on the team, not the most expert.
The salient point here is that instead of unpacking my duffle again and rechecking my list, I opted to just expend my energy in something physical. Now I can pop another beer and survey my handiwork in peace, and then eat a burrito, shower, strap my CPAP on and sleep my ass off until tomorrow.
Every year starts with resolutions and this is the first year in over a decade that I don't have "weight loss" in any way, shape or form on my list. I've managed to fill that void with other, more challenging items.
wouldn’t rise
Clearly, this is true.
The reason why we profit so little by Holy Mass is, because we go to it with so little sense of the immense treasures which are communicated to us by means of it: as f the blood of a God were a thing of small account to merit us heaven, to obtain us pardon for our sins, to appease the Divine Justice, and to acknowledge worthily the favours God hath done us, and his love for us in the most blessed Sacrament; all which is performed by the means of Holy Mass.
A crew waist-deep
Letting you all know that I've got the fever!
My search for the Gardner art would take me to four countries, a dozen states, and more cities and towns than I care to count. I would develop a deep and consuming zeal for the case. That consuming zeal comes through in the writing of the book. His frustration and excitement bounced off the pages and carried me with him. I'm kicking myself for waiting so long to read this and if I didn't have to be somewhere in the morning, there is no way I'd put the book down! I expect to finish it before Monday ends.
At NLU, an independent institution that just celebrated its 125th anniversary, BOMA/Chicago members can earn a Bachelor of Science in Management (BSM), Master of Science in Management (MSM) or Master of Business Administration (MBA). The following benefits are offered to BOMA/Chicago members:
2) AARP Study (2010)–that showed that the percentage of adults over 45 that were chronically lonely had almost doubled from 20% in 2000 to 35% in 2010.
How, then, if we handle chores and money in such a way, do we teach children to use money wisely and appreciate its value?
And, in his respect for individual liberties, Salisbury was not without American counterparts prior to Reagan. Democrat hero FDR imprisoned almost all people of Japanese descent living in the USA after the attack on Pearl Harbour by the Empire of Japan. This totally Fascistic contempt for individual liberties is well-known and fortunately still attracts some controversy. But there was little opposition to it at the time. "Progressive" thinking was very dominant in American politics in the first half of the 20th. century. One State governor salvages some self-respect for America over it, however: Colorado governor Carr:
In some states, a diploma can be issued by your school (your parents). Again, the acceptability of this document will vary from college to college. As will the acceptability of a GED.
Any repetitive body movement is a stim. And we all do it. And we all undoubtedly annoy someone in the process of that. The issue isn't the stimming behavior. The issue should be whether it interferes in the child's life and whether it's intrinsically harmful behavior.
For once, albeit too late for league positions, he and we got something. Let’s hope it carries on to next Saturday.
In a 2 cup mixing cup, measure the flour, baking powder, and kosher salt together.
In an interview with Cross earlier this year, he told me: “In many ways I couldn’t ask for a better parent, which is kind of why I took his name. He is the single most formative influence on my life. But he was also a white supremacist, a thief, an adulterer, possibly a bigamist, and essentially a religious crank.”
Here are some recent pics of us hanging out at home. Watching hockey games on TV, Noah being silly (by wearing a water diaper on his head), lounging around in our pjs.... just taking it slow and relaxing.
From the WSJournal...
Maybe it’s working with such strong and respected (to him) source material, but Tarantino is at his most relaxed as a director here. When Tarantino is at his comparative worst (which is still pretty good), it’s when he falls in love with his ability to be flashy and shades-wearing cool as opposed to the non-shades, Steve McQueen cool evidenced by Forster in BROWN. There are still plenty of nods to his usual bag of tricks, but those nods are largely visual instead of verbal, and even they they’re understated. On the whole, Tarantino is content to let the actors dominate this understated ride. The result is a confident, relaxed masterpiece.
The greenhouse, which will open in late 2013, is already serving as a model for other cities—Plantagon hopes to install the transportation helix technology in regular office buildings around the world, eliminating the need to build entirely new structures. The tallest models even have a name: Plantascrapers.
Applying Leadership and Management Skills within your Organization
and mail your check to:
It's also great to see we're all getting braver with giving each other constructive criticism, we all know each other well enough by now, there's no need to be afraid! This growing confidence in critiquing each other's work was easily seen when I went over my previous W.o.W posts to choose one for this week's exercise. The comments on the older posts contain hardly any criticisms or suggestions at all! It would be interesting to know what everyone thinks of them now, personally I can see how my writing has improved over the months of participating in this group.
what does it mean, that the world is beautiful--
but carries in itself the light of hidden flowers;
Aldo Cibic
It filled my heart with warmth and happiness.
I was still within earshot as they discussed the Tip.
Welcome to my first K-Tel Friday post of 2011. Someone did some serious Christmas shopping and came up with this goodie for homercat to unwrap. At this rate homercat is likely to amass the largest collection of K-Tel vinyl on the island. Near as I can tell Bright Side of Music probably came out sometime in 1973. Once again there isn't a date to be found anywhere on the album. They managed to cram 22 songs on this one. Whenever that happens you can be assured that there are some crazy edits of the tunes and this one doesn't disappoint. For a 22er the sound quality is surprisingly good. Usually it seems the more songs they put on the lesser the quality. I would really be surprised if I were to ever come across a "mint" condition copy of a K-Tel, I bet they're hard to find. I didn't do much editing here other than a few click-pop removals. For me the most surprising thing about this album was the fact that it contains 13 songs that I had never heard before in my life and that's a rarity. So this one was a real treat for me to rip.
Although we continued to check the house on into early December, we could tell the heart had gone out of this garden and indeed its owner did find a new place where she could create her own paradise in a setting with more land and more privacy. These are the last photos I took at Sea Garden on my last visit there, 6 December, 2008.
Meh! That's the best I can say about these socks.
ISAIAH 52:12 But you will not leave in haste or go in flight; for the LORD will go before you, for the GOD OF ISRAEL will be YOUR REAR GUARD.
Kids need free time or they can’t invent their own games, rules, worlds. That kind of inventing is as valuable a childhood activity as any I can think of.
The Best Curtain Ideas Are Just a Click Away
Musiciens Additionels
Day 1 - All about style (yours and Jenny's!). Discovering and developing your own style of photography and hearing about how Jenny molded hers. We will also be covering and teaching how to pose/engage with your clients, composition, how to see light, wedding day run through, how to get a maximum number of shots within a small space or short period of time, workflow/editing, elements of business and branding will start today and continue on day 3, and Q&A session.
Buy Cute Aprons is based in the United Kingdom and at the moment all prices are in British Pounds Stirling.
If you don’t have a good handle on the topic you’re writing about, your message is not going to be effective. Before you can offer advice or inform your readers about a topic, you need to know a good deal about it. The purpose of your writing is to come off as an expert. If your content only includes the basics, your readers aren’t going to take action.
I have a patriotic wreath on my front door now which I will show more of in a later post when I share all of my Patriotic decorations with you....
Draw
Jean-Michel Basquiat
Learns he could've gone back to his home world whenever he wanted if he clicked his heels 3 times.
The sentiment stamp is from Magnolia.
Mal Peet's win of the Guardian Children's Book Prize was announced at their swanky new offices in King's Place last night. Exposure is the third in Mal's "football" series set in South America and , incredibly, only his fourth book. (His Tamar won the Carnegie Medal).
12:18 AM
I took Child #4 (11 year old daughter) along with me. She took the photos. And helped me find the library (because she actually has a sense of direction!). And she helped with the technical junk (setting up the projector, speakers, etc.). Basically, the kid is indispensable. (Read the end of this post for her words of wisdom on the visit.)
Given this, I ask you to stand behind your product, it’s quality and test of time by opening an Anthropolgie resale market. Do not develop a lower grade product to broaden your market like so many other retailers before you in the form of false outlets. Do not compromise your quality or design. Take your current customers and offer them the opportunity to sell back items they no longer need. Offer them store credit towards new purchases to strengthen that initial market and open a new market of second hand Anthropolgie. Toss in authentic vintage if you like. Go beyond selling and teach. Yes, teach your customers about quality. Teach us how to own something wonderful and wear it for 20 years. Be good to your customer, consider what will keep them healthy and they will return the good will by remaining loyal and marketing your efforts over coffee with friends. What better marketing effort is there than personal testimony?
IT IS ALSO A FDA REGULATED CLASS 1 MEDICAL DEVICE!
Because I'm not dans le (in the) townhouse right now, I have been forced to abandon home-related projects temporarily. But idle hands make me fidgety, so I whipped up some jewellery this weekend. What can I say? I am DIY obsessed. I even attended a wedding and still found time to craft (and yard sale!)
Innovation undermines the Empire's ability to tighten its grip over the distribution and manufacture of all products and services. The "crisis" of Global Warming has given it an open ended mandate, but its population is clever and able to innovate faster than it can regulate. Its educational systems controlled from the top down are aimed at indoctrinating conformity and suppressing independent thought, but like most empires it is still too slow. It controls most media channels, but innovation and individualism still keeps outpacing it.
Sophie Koch is perfect as Charlotte - evincing both youthful beauty and a sentimental picture of maternal warmth. She is not a glamorous singer, but the sound is pure, very big and well controlled with excellent intonation and diction. Up close she can be horribly distracting with her strangely mobile rubber lips, (completely inappropriate for German singing) but I really liked her this evening.
Last month, I spent a fascinating couple of days at the Skoll World Forum on Social Entrepreneurship in Oxford, England. It was exhilarating–and deeply moving–to hear example after example of social entrepreneurs making quantifiable improvements in lives all around the world. As Stephan Chambers, chairman of the Skoll Centre, put it: “I have cried every day this week. Remember as I tell you this, that I’m male. And British. And from Oxford.” I actually cried every hour. But, remember, I’m female. And Greek. And from Cambridge.
cvnp day camps
1. Enormous
VIVIENNE: Facebook
Notes: Its a slightly tangy dish, so be prepared.
2010.07.31 Pakistan North Waziristan 2 0 Two Afghan refugees are abducted and shot to death by Islamic fundamentalists.
What you think and believe will direct what you say, and what you say will direct what you do, and what you do will create your unique and talented destiny!
So this 10p for a bag of doughnuts has become a cri de guerre for Mr. J. Oh yes! He is proud of his great achievement. He is a mighty warrior in the crusade of saving money. He is the Spendthrift Superhero.
I’ve been wondering still about the transition towards barefoot or minimalist running and am hoping that these Kinvara3s might be able to help me get there. Does anyone out there know if slight over-pronators can go minimalist or barefoot? Anyway, racked up a reasonable 43k this week plus a swim. This coming week, a whack of us at BGU are going with a nationally ranked swimmer who is going to teach us proper technique.
Professor: Have you ever felt your GOD, tasted your GOD, smelt your GOD? Have you ever had any sensory perception of GOD for that matter?
Sweater: TJ Maxx
2 feeling
Will the sun’s magnetism continue to free fall during Solar Cycle 24 or will it level off into a steady state similar to the old solar cycles? Will the next decade produce massive solar storms or will we see the start of a Dalton type minimum or even enter a more severe solar Grand Minima producing another Little Ice Age? As a scientist I can say that I do not have all the answers. The road ahead is bricked in uncertainty. But what is certain is the sun is undergoing a state change and two main threats lie on the horizon.
I was quite surprised at how good the veggie burger actually was. It did not taste like a real hamburger, but the taste was not bad. It was flavorful and had a crumbly texture. The hardest part was actually cooking the burger. Since the patties are made with vegetables, beans, nuts, and wheat, it pretty much fell apart. I ended up having to wrap it in tin foil and place it on the grill. The meal as a whole was a success and I plan on eating veggie burgers often.
Sometimes Philippine History was taught entirely in English because most of the history books were in English. The Spaniards wrote a number of history books, which were translated to English. Even Filipinos who wrote history books chose to write in English. An entire history of a colonized society is not even in their language.
Wow, five days of posts! Art or Idiocy? is doing well. Tomorrow (Sat 10/28/6) is the Museum of Contemporary Art's Benefit Auction. The marvelous affair is being held at the MCA's warehouse. A novel mixture of high society and industrial ambience. Art or Idiocy? was fortunate enough to be at the preview last week. Of course we took photos, and they are up in a special Flikr slide show. HERE
I have two of Merle O'Grady's necklaces and although they are very strong statement pieces, I find them very wearable, not to mention beautifully made. This season I'll be saving up for another bombshell necklace - though I'm having trouble choosing which! The collection is available now at her own website as well as My-Wardrobe.
white shirt, and decent formal black tie, and decent pantaloons of
The FBI and local officials held a press conference Tuesday morning to announce Konias’ arrest.
Look for the GREAT OFFER notation as I’ve targeted which getaways will help make the most of your travel dollar.
Every doctor takes the Hippocratic Oath which is: First, do no harm. This doctor irrefutably caused irreparable harm to all of Nadya’s older children. The odds are very high that at least one of the octuplets will have permanent cognitive impairment – if not all. Three of her older children were already diagnosed along the autism spectrum, including ADHD – before she got implanted with the octuplets.
By thanksgiving the nature and cattle’s
I sure hope @MyPretendDog isn’t chewing on the couch.
My next creation is my favorite of the lot. I had bought these bright yellow Magnesite carved flower beads with the thought they would come in handy for some fall jewelry. Add some yellow Crazy Lace Agate beads from my stash, a single painted shell coin bead, mixed with the flowered Copper ring and the oval wooden beads that Rose sent me and we have...
The very second that I finished the cabinets, I wanted to start on the trim and doors. But I was far to overwhelmed. So I waited. For about 3 too long years.
Russell Lee and Jack Delano were the main photographers, and at the time worked for the Farm Security Administration/Office of War Information The locations of the photos range from New Mexico to Texas to Massachusetts to Maine and "are some of the only color photographs taken of the effects of the Depression on America’s rural and small town populations. The photographs and captions are the property of the Library of Congress and were included in a 2006 exhibit Bound for Glory: America in Color."
Ever wake up with a desire for fresh cinnamon raisin bread to go with your coffee? I did this morning. Ellen Weber, raved about Wegmans freshly baked cinnamon raisin bread at least twice in the last two days. The thought of it kept playing in my mind. I could almost taste it...
P.P.S. Mancunians of a certain age will doubtless have different memories of Victoria Baths - the cold, the rusty taps, the swing-doors on the always too small cubicles, the eye-searing combination of chlorine and urine .... but I thought this picture was best.
Former President Thabo Mbeki was frequently criticised for taking a low profile on Zimbabwe, and refraining from public criticism of the fascist Mugabe regime.
She puts the Kong in the crate and tells me to go inside. I obey. The gray people are in the box again. And he’s here, lying on the couch next to my crate.
Christina: I've been in Etsy Dallas since 2008 and I'm so proud of how much the team has grown.
Introverts are people who primarily look inward, paying close attention to their thoughts and emotions. It’s not that they are incapable of paying attention to what is going on around them, it’s just that their inner world is much more stimulating and rewarding to them.
(p.s. the “secrets” are basically wall decorations that you can “move” by pressing the open key, exposing compartments full of ammo, a weapon or even treasure).
I used the new sketch from Sketches in Thyme for a double layout. So head on over and play along, this is a great sketch to get lots of pictures of a page without it looking super cluttered.
That's why I enjoyed this movie in the end. It's a story that lets the audience use their imagination to figure out what was going on the whole time. There is no precise spoon fed solution given to you. A lot of people think it's annoying when films don't give a solid answer, but I don't understand why. When movies provoke people to think it adds to a much greater experience. Not every movie has to be like Transformers where everything is just mindless and things go boom. There are a LOT of films out there that do inspire you to create your own conclusion. Now I'm not saying that Intruders is a sophisticated art house film, because it's far from that. But it leaves a slightly open ending, which is something I like.
If I am willing to do the work
Creativity is a fragile thing that can be easily wrecked and shattered by destructive criticism, no matter what age you are. It is one reason why I deliberate and use careful language when I am asked to evaluate someone's writing. Most writers are fragile about their work, me included. It is important to get honest evaluation of your writing but we also need to hear good things about what we do, because most of us don't think we are any good, or at least not good enough. It is not that we are looking for flattery, because empty praise is useless indeed.
As for the romantic elements . . well, they’re nothing to write home about. Gendo and Yui, who star as students in a sidestory that takes up all of volume five, have a nice little love story, but other than that none of the character’s love lives are particularly interesting, and certainly not unique. Really, Angelic Days boasts no unique or even notable plot elements.
So there you have it... and from the bottom of my heart I thank everyone that has every commented, emailed, prayed, gave me hope, etc. through this blog. I have had so many emotional times sitting here typing and all of you have been there for me just as much or more than real life friends... so this is extremely hard for me. But it's time for me to move on...
Hubby saw me paying the bill and was shocked at the rate. He said, "We need to cancel." So, I started researching alternatives. We can't do satellite or dish because of the direction our apartment faces.
This time, events will be held in Saitama and Kobe. We are planning programs for the event which will allow many fans to have a fun time. We look forward to applications from everyone! The following categories of guests will be eligible to apply for the fanclub events this time.
The wizard has his own tricks. In addition to the detect magic, they can cast a ray of frost each round for 1d3 – not too shabby. They have 2 or three daily spells besides the ray, but the wizard was not left out of the “something to do every round” sweep, and the ray of frost becomes puny beside the amazing staff hurling abilty (which I dubbed the Blunt Spear technique) and was actually the wizards best at will power. This meant the wizard never had to resort to his dagger or crossbow, unlike previous editions. Magic missile required no to hit roll, and was the ultimate demise of the big bad Black Fang, by a twice-unconscious wizard lying on the ground at its feet.
Depending in your perspective, this scenario was either endearing or rather annoying. Around the 1 hand, how fantastic it was to have this kind of individual focus to our footwear purchases.
I am not looking forward to tomorrow. Not at all. My 2 days off were not enough.
You too, spare the sown seed, you ants,
Here are some more numbers: In 2000, there were 435,000 tobacco-related deaths; (18.1% of total US deaths), poor diet and physical inactivity accounted for another 400,000 deaths; (16.6%), and alcohol consumption 85,000 deaths (3.5%).
I'm going to be blogging again soon! Look what I received in the mail yesterday thanks to my Mom, Sisters & Brother. Happy Early Birthday to me!!! I'm so lucky to have such awesome family. Mom, Erin, Darcy & Derek...I love you so much. Thank you!
to Congress
living there– we smile
was given as well.
I'll be hopefully attending the more technical lectures on brewing and brewing techniques.
She's meddling with her own lips and she's daubing them with a coral rust pencil. She's pausing. She's looking for more flaws to conceal. She's sharpening her cosmetic armaments and then she's reaching the finale. Nothing is becoming grand, she scours. She's ending the masquerade by faking some reds on her zygomatic arch. She might be having a ball today.
There were a bunch of us together in beautiful midcoast Maine for a weekend back in July, and we took turns making meals. I had signed up to do lunch one day, and figured with a little advance planning, my co-lunch-maker and I would have minimal prep work as well as being flexible on the exact time people ate, which was nice on a hot saturday afternoon (or was it sunday?). Of course, early November is a dumb time for me to be telling you about how to make an easy mid-summer lunch for a group of vacationing people... but you can keep it in mind for next year. Or make it now and pretend it's summer.
People will believe what they want to
#4) Nap rooms
This particular segment was much better, although I still heard the word supple more times than I care to.
Someone was coming down the stairs. Ann thought about holding Chris’s hand but remembered the shocks. A barefoot woman in jeans and a red fleece pullover turned the corner and came into the living room. She looked up in shock. “Chris!” It was Donna, his wife.
So POOF, a bright green bean appeared, and it WAS cool."
We do not know if the message bore any fruit. We are not told. The law of average would say, “some”. Perhaps some were believers by James definition in Acts 21:20, being “zealous of the law”. Such a message should reinstate them to that faith. Many others were lost and now, for the first time had an eyewitness report of the resurrection of their Messiah. Still others who had been wavering now understood from God’s authority that Jesus was the Christ, the Son of the living God. They now could take that step of faith.
(You can imagine these headings to be accompanied by the dramatic Law & Order "Chung-Chung" if you'd like.)
“Take it back”, I scream throwing the mirror to the floor. Glass shatters all over the kitchen and in the bedroom doorway. I see my dad heading toward me and I know it’s all over.
This law would mostly hurt someone like a sole proprietor or a writer or artist who landed it big enough to qualify; people who may have made a million dollars, but who don't have the shelters and power of the Buffets of the world.
Hello friends of Our Daily Bread designs! Welcome to the December Release Blog Hop! If you have not had a chance to view the full release, scroll down one post to see it all! What a fantastic assortment of sets Kelley has released yet again this month!!!
I went there last night for a quick drink on my way to the West End. The Brasserie Bar had been hired out for a party (the old bar had two rooms which allowed parties to be held without inconveniencing regular customers), therefore I had to go to the lounge next door. I was advised by the "head man" that there were no tables available and that I would have to sit in the corridor (on ridiculously small and uncomfortable seats).
My fingers bled from those thorns. The thorns caused inflammation and tenderness in every spot they gouged me. And, I was not intentionally trying to touch those thorns! The thorns Jesus endured for my salvation were pierced into his scalp and head! I have a hard time with the translation of the word “put” in our passage. The Bible is inerrant, and those soldiers did put that crown of thorns on His head—but “put” is such a generic word. These were Roman soldiers, titans of cruelty, who were mocking Him. They “put” that crown on with strength, viciousness and intent to harm. Oh, what Jesus bore for my sin—for your sin! This was just the beginning of His torture as He took on the sins of the world to provide Redemption for all of those who choose to believe He is the Son of God and accept His payment for theirs. He endured beatings, mocking, and yes, the death on the cross! There are no words that adequately express what He suffered, and there are no words that should adequately express our gratitude. We should thank Him with every day of life, and it still will not be enough!
No, hurry up and wait. I hurried Friday night so I could be ready Sunday morning. Here I sit at the shipper. I just got the phone call I expected an hour ago. “Yeah, we wont be able to load you til around 6.” PM. I have another 10 hours to sit. Someone in the planning stages didn’t have their shit together and now I waste another ten hours. I’m not the adventurous type when it comes to getting out of the truck and walking around exploring places. I don’t like crowds. I don’t like shopping. I don’t care for country music and country music fans. So where am I parked you might ask? Opryland. My own personal hell. I know it’s not that bad. But in ten hours, I fully expected to be considering going to the yard and then home; parking the truck at my house; or just going straight to the receiver and staying there for the night. Now all I’m thinking is how late am I willing to drive after sitting around all day. Will I get it there by 8AM? Do I really need to be there at 8AM?
It is the strangest thing, and I’m fairly certain all of you have experienced this to some degree. You can study vocabulary lists for weeks straight but the words just leave your head as easily as they went in it, but one day you just hear a word in a song or on a show – one of the very same words you were just studying and now the word just wont leave. You couldn’t forget it even if you wanted to.
A.D. 1189, not coincidentally, is the same date as the year Richard the Lionheart (a.k.a. King Richard I) ascended to the throne of England and launched the Third Crusade. Crusaders rallied at Nottingham Castle, a stronghold of the King, before traveling to Jerusalem. It is believed that these Crusaders stopped at the inn. “Given that in the Middle Ages, a ‘Trip’ was not a journey as such but rather a resting place where such a journey could be broken, it is understandable how the Inn came to be called ‘Ye Olde Trip To Jerusalem’.”
The part of the story where Mikael finds the photos of the parade and notices Harriet staring at someone was carried out much better in the original and the photos used were just more convincing and helped tell the story better.
Philadelphia Phillies - Brad (PAID)
Cousin Brielle saved one of our days by playing with her. She was so patient and loving. It was difficult to watch her interact with cousins, friends, and neighbors and be the different person she is on steroids. I didn't raise her that way. I don't teach her to speak that way. Disciplining her is almost useless when she is on steroids. I basically had to alienate her from people beacuse it was heartbreaking to watch her communicate and interact.
Showcases are the best industry secret, a great happening all around the world. Songsalive! Showcases are a very cozy, intimate and acoustic environment where media and music industry representatives often drop by to check out the latest talent. Showcase your music and support our Songsalive! national and international live events and showcases presenting songwriters and artists of original music. Showcases are conducted globally.
Bittersweet Mint
and sewed a line of large beads together for a 'clasp'...
In my mind, the ducks were swimming for shore. No matter how hard their little feet rowed under the placid water, they never got closer. They got slower and slower and slower until it seemed like the world itself had come to a halt. Even the ripples they sailed on crested and never settled. It was a tiny surfer’s greatest dream. The trees had grown heavy with age. The bees and the birds labored with their wings until they stopped beating and yet they hung suspended in the air from invisible strings. The puppeteer was asleep, relaxed, blissful. The wind was caught in the jar of the world, and its inaudible melodies were trapped as though in amber. In this world, there is magic that exists outside Art.
I thought of this question because of the little ticket In Grip We Trust use as their calling card that came in each box. It reminded me of the ticket I got when I was a little girl going to the Fox Theatre in St. Louis with my grandparents. This theatre is the most beautiful theatre I have yet to see in my life. There may be a couple in New York or London that can rival it, but there can't be many in the Western world. If you have a chance in your life to see this, you should.
Tuesday,Louis Farrakhan head of Nation of Islam made an appearance at Alabama A&M University where he set off a fire storm with his comment Jesus was a black Muslim.
We are just leaving Ushuaia, on Tierra del Fuego, in Argentina, we have had a great cruise so far…
Preheat oven 20 210C. Brush a 12 hole muffin pan with melted butter or oil.
Right from the days as little girls (me and my sister) till the date my sis got married and I moved to Finland, we have stayed completely over protected, right under the shadow of dad, hardly did we know what the world was. Our world used to revolve around, mum, dad, school and college. We still are quite tightly knitted family. Never did we have the feeling of want nor any desire since it was already there for us when it has to be. No we weren't spoiled but they thought us where our limits should be. Moving far from them has been a challenging but a beautiful learning experience.
If fax is sent from outside the United States, dial first the International Area
There is so much wrong with this it's hard to know where to start. I understand their feelings, but it's not healthy for society. I suppose if they never were to marry it would be fine, but lots of men at 23 or 24 don't really think of themselves as marrying. It seems so far off. Chances are, though, that they will eventually tie the knot, and I don't think you should squander those years when you could potentially be saving.
I'm getting ready to head out the door to walk and then I think I'll ride my bike to the library to return these books and grab a few more. The day is supposed to be in the 70's so I'm thinking I might be able to persuade hubby to take a drive to the high country. I'm am so enjoying our spring like weather!!!
*wish us luck*
Inside this issue we honor veterans, talk about the City's new trash and recycling service, get tips from BSO about "bullying," learn about exciting upcoming Fall events, and so much more!
Yesterday, FX canceled Terriers and network president John Landgraf held a conference call to explain. Hitfix's Alan Sepinwall:
7. Start Accepting Stop Expecting - Accept people and situations the way they are. No-one and no situation is perfect. Accept them anyways. Love your friends, love your situation, love every little thing about your self and your life and accept the shortcomings. In accepting we stop expecting. Expectation only brings about sadness and regret. Both not very happy emotions. No expectation means no regret, no sadness. Acceptance paves the way for immense happiness everyday.
Sometimes I wish I were a scientist. I’d like to invent something or create my own theory. With my limited scientific knowledge, I have attempted to make my alternative theory to the Big Bang Theory.
Ich möchte hier teilnehmen:
Imagine Devant Maharaj can come out and say that 5 former chairmen of BWEE/CAL have demonstrated that they had no common sense when running the airline. One of these former chairmen is now the head of the Integrity Commission, appointed by Prime Minister Kamla Persad-Bissessar. So Devant Maharaj is actually implying that his government appoints stupid people to run Commissions.
09. High Hopes
Here's my fix, and it's so simple I bet you kick yourself for not thinking of it first:
Which makes Condi Rice either really fucking dumb, or really fucking evil. She’s never struck me as unintelligent.
Here is a photograph of them still in process (lying on my bed as I picked out greenery and such to adorn them. (You will notice I did not end up choosing to include the large purple themed bird that appears on the bed. It rather dwarfed the wings.)
2. become an follower of this blog, if you don't allready an follower
It's in there somewhere.
One of the most immediate tracks on the much-lauded ISAM. The Youtube notes say that Tobin speeded up his own voice to create the “female” vocal on this track.
“You should try ‘ride-em-roll-em’ with Marcus!” Hubby suggests to me. (Ride-em-roll-em is my most effective g-orgasm position, and yes, my lovelies, blog to follow)
Make sure you know the difference.
This Alabama hip-hop duo has had a prolific few years, and they bookended 2011 with this back-to-front masterpiece in January and the more uneven, but still impressive, iSLAND, which came out towards the end of the year. The One... Cohesive lives up to its title by being a totally consistent and cohesive rap album, unified by the production of the Block Beattaz, whose blend of rave-glow electronics, strings and piano, and skittery, complex beats provides the perfect backdrop for rappers ST 2 Lettaz and Yung Clova. At one point, they lament that critics simplistically compare them to Outcast, and indeed the comparison mainly makes sense in terms of the broad family resemblance of Southern rap; there's no question that they have their own style. The album's packed with guest rappers and singers — every track has at least one guest — but these contributions are smoothly integrated into the duo's sound. Indeed, such collaboration seems to be a big part of their ethos: the album is a celebration of forming a de facto family from musical collaborators and friends, and they tout the virtue of remaining loyal to their "inner circle." Coupled with the epic grandeur of the music, the lyrics are often stirring and emotionally complex, expressing positivity about the future and awareness of the poverty and troubles of the past. That is, when they're not taking a break to deliver a club banger oozing with hometown machismo, or a celebration of girls taking naked cell phone pictures. That's kind of key to the album's appeal, actually: despite all the introspection in many of the lyrics, G-Side never take themselves so seriously that the music stops being fun. [buy]
And lastly, but most importantly, remember that you do have a life outside of school! Take time for yourself and enjoy it outside of your classroom once in a while. :)
Apologies for not blogging much in the last month. As you can imagine, settling into a new life takes time! One thing I have been freshly aware of in these days of change for us as a family, is the amazing cohabitation of suffering and resurrection that make up our lives. Some things come in pairs. Laurel and Hardy. Crackers and cheese. Wallace and Gromit. Suffering and Resurrection.
He said pegs were knocked into his land a week ago and on Sunday morning earthmoving equipment was brought in to level the land.
Why do social networkers behave the way they do? The survey didn’t capture what percentage of self-identified social networkers were using social media sites as part of their delegated job duties as compared to what percentage were doing so without authorization from their supervisors. If the numbers in the latter category were large, then the statistics may reflect a general disposition towards noncompliant behavior from those employees. In other words, being an active social networker may not be the source of their views on ethics; instead it could simply be one more example of how the employees bend or break the rules.
I still have enough decoupage cut out to make two more cards ... I'll have to get a wriggle on though if I'm to get them done, dusted and posted in time for Easter; and I think I'll be ready for a change by then!
Apart from the graffiti, there's not much to see on these four walls. Nothing much in the way of inspiration or comfort? I’ll get more community service; I’m in no doubt of that. At the last count it stood at almost three hundred hours.
They will showcase their technical skills as well as some of their ideas as to how stations can make children’s issues a priority.
Discover the Science of HUMAN MAGNETIC FIELD. A Science of Magnetism in the Human Body.
“There it is!” I followed her pointing arm. Yes, there is was, a solitary ring of toadstools. It circled the hill top. This ring of tiny red toadstools.
reduced, allowing you to acquire beautiful and important pieces at substantially reduced prices. We want you to get the pieces you’ve been longing for at the best prices so we will show you our pricing plan up front allowing you to plan and decide…”do I buy it now or risk it being gone later?”
Friendship
As stated, the City is providing the H1N1 vaccine at no cost to public and non-public school students. Elementary school students have received H1N1 information packets with vaccination consent forms that parents and guardians must return to have their children vaccinated. No child will be vaccinated without parental consent.
Third: Vincent – 19
My porch for the weekend, anyway. We are here for the Labor Day weekend and this is just what the doctor ordered for me. I am already stress free and relaxed and having a wonderful time.
I say all of this to provide preface for and explain the following statement:
Some were hard to photograph due to their shininess but i have done some close ups of the more textured ones....also there were different colored ones so some surpises still:)
3. There's a limit to how many revisions I'll do particularly if you aren't getting better.
This time it takes. The firmware steps into the modern world, dusts off her jacket, and functions.
and deliver us from evil.
Very interesting "6 degree ish" happenings..... Years later living on Lambeth Drive as the family up the street ,we made very good & strong friendship with the Don Butt jr. family. So cool.... Don Butt senior was the owner of the Columbia Dodge where I bought my 1967 Tiger.
On the last day after our final exams, the batch partied in a way only medical students knew how – wildly. Prior to that however, the lower year level and the school administration threw us a send-off party, where a couple of people who’d gone before us gave us tips on how to survive clerkship. One of our favorite doctor-teachers, who specializes in obstetrics-gynecology, also wrote each one of us a few tips on how to survive not only clerkship but also internship and residency as well. I’m collating all of their tips here and philosophizing on each one because, despite being medical clerks, we are still extremely philosophical beings.
September 23 - Charles Hickson, alleged UFO abductee, 80
“Shutting up.” Piper answered smartly, backing off, with the other man quietly commenting, “You know…it’s not to late to make some.”
6. All deliveries will be given a tracking number. Tracking numbers will be sent to buyers and posted online.
At Black Rock, I swam around five turtles that were munching on coral. It's a wonderful experience swimming with these endangered species. When one would start to swim towards me I would just float and let him or her decide which way to turn...sometimes right underneath me! I was always careful never to touch them and even reprimanded a young guy who was petting one. That's kapu! (forbidden). I shot off the roll of film in minutes of the turtles and fish in the area.
It won’t help you, would just hurt you instead
Anyhow...if it doesn't appear later or if it does, Happy Easter and Happy Passover!
Or the boy who gets bullied all the time by kids who tease him and tell him that he's gay, and he comes to me after school one day and confides in me that he's afraid they might be right and he doesn't understand his feelings and he doesn't know what to do. That's not an area in which I have any specific expertise, but it's something very very personal and private that he trusts me enough to talk to me about. And now when he comes to me I'm supposed to turn him away and send him to a guidance counselor instead, with whom he may or may not have the same comfort level or trust? How is that going to help him? How will it make him feel when he comes to tell me his deepest secret and I tell him, "sorry, not interested. Go talk to someone else."
All the above make Brussels festival a good choice for international tango experiences. In general the festival was very well organized with good quality professional dancers, courses and demonstrations. On top of that, the venues for the milongas were really fabulous, extremely cosy and elegant and the only drawback is the same that applies for all the festivals of this scale… They are too big and rather cold… Meeting people and making ‘friends’ is a little bit difficult as there are too many people in such a big space and the ambience hardly ever warms up. On the other hand the feeling of being part of something so big and well organised has a charm on its own…
*You can find egg roll wrappers in the refrigerated produce section of your grocery store. If for some reason you cant find them just use small tortillas, you may need to warm them before you roll the filling inside. They will turn out more like taquitos but they will still be good!
The first – I’ve Seen The Future – had:
It still needed a little something so I made a cushion to place on top of that by measuring the inside of the chair and cutting out two pieces of fabric accordingly, sewed it, stuffed it, and threw it in the chair. To give the chair a special touch, I stenciled three very meaningful numbers on the top with some vintage stencils hubby brought home and gray craft paint. Here's what it looks like all spiffed up.
The hospital eventually moved to its current plot in 1780, but most of the buildings on site today date from the 1950s and 60s. The architects of this post-war rebuild apparently decided to make the hospital as visible as possible in its landscape, dressing the buildings in cornflower blues and concrete honeycombs. A classical statue of Louis IX on an art-deco pedestal faces away from the hospital, and these are indeed not buildings to be admired from the outside. This is an establishment for tired eyes though, and a clever system of blinds and shuttering ensure that it is a healing one.
I hope I will be inspired to do something like that for someone else today. I'm sure I'm paraphrasing here, but I remember a saying of Mother Theresa's that goes something like this, "Do no great things, only small things with great love."
Smart, economically sound customers are good customers. When all the other customers have maxed out their credit, your stable customers will go the distance.
You can feel it.
Aside from the terrible attempt at police procedural, the story is little more than a thinly veiled excuse to have a lot of people murdered whilst dressed as Father Christmas. The British setting is a novelty, but otherwise it's just another urban slasher movie ala Maniac Cop and the occasional Giallo. The mystery elements are tedious, the red herrings predictable. And in a city populated by people too stupid to, y'know, not dress as Santa when there's a Santa-hating murderer on the loose, the killer has plenty of victims to choose from.
Ok now I know you are dying to see what the team has come up with and what they have used new I know I was because I am very nosey. lol Click on their names in the sidebar to jump to their blog for more information and show them some love because we all need some dont we.
Several weeks ago I was passing snack to my children when I noticed a child crying. I ask what was wrong and several children chimed in to say the child had eaten before we said the blessing. The child, through tears, said, "I'm sorry, I forgot". I had just set the bag of crackers down on the counter. I reached over took out a couple of the bite-sized crackers and ate them. The children looked at me silently with wide eyes. I immediately placed my hand over my mouth and said, "Oh my I just ate a cracker". I continued to explain that God doesn't care when we give thanks. He only ask us to give thanks. My tearful friend was now giggling and everyone else was hushed.
BLITZER: Congressman Paul, who is right?
I am writing to profess my utter disbelief at how little you seem to understand the current mood of the nation. In a story at Bloomberg today, you and a handful of fellow banker and billionaire “job creators” were quoted as believing that the horrific sentiment directed toward you from virtually all corners of America had something to do with how much money you had. I’d like to take a moment to disabuse you of this foolishness.
The pleasure is when you ring to yourself on an empty road, you are the world’s best rock star.
I spent most of yesterday either standing in line (enrollment lines, housing lines, financial aid lines, you know the drill), or driving in line (who knew interstate traffic could be so busy on a Tuesday?).
(In fact, going on recommendations levels in previous years, I reckon six, five or even four recommendations will usually be more than enough to get a spot on the shortlist under the new rules - in the best novel category in 2010, only one title got as many as six recommendations, and that was when members could make unlimited recommendations per category, not just three. I reckon that under the new rules a canny publicist could buy a book straight onto the shortlist for under £300.)
in winning
Next up, the bookshelves :
Next I ink the pencil drawing. This defines all the major areas, as well as adding some textures and details to objects.
Chapter 3: Out in the Muggle night, Harry is worried that the Ministry of Magic will be after him for using wizardry ungerage in the Muggle world. He’s also aware that he doesn’t have any Muggle money, though there’s a little gold at the bottom of his trunk.
There’s really no reason not to have Evernote, did I mention it’s free? The only thing you need to ask yourself is, is it worth it for you to pay for premium features or not.
The other part of the award is to pass it onto 15 more deserving people, and there I falter, because I think the recipients might sigh and hurl bricks at me. Most of them have already got one, it seems, and are mentioned by other recipients. I'll try, though, and I'll do it in Adullamite's stealthy way, in which he doesn't actually inform the recipient directly, just tags them in a post. I'll try to add some that readers here might enjoy.
Include standard key words
KORDSMEIER J. Influenza Vaccinations: Should They Be Mandatory for Nurses? PRO. MCN Am J Matern Child Nurs 2006; 31: 76.
Serves a crowd, with leftovers.
“I lived during the time of the Book of Mormon. The Lord asked me to build a boat and take my family across the ocean to a promised land. I didn’t know how to build a boat, but I learned how. I was obedient to the Lord. Who Am I?” (Nephi) “Nephi’s Courage” -120 (This is built on the idea of an apron with velcro. Very quick to put on and off.)
If you're not in a good position to make a donation would you consider doing a fundraiser for us? Perhaps you could put together a yard sale with some friends or at your church or set up a bake sale at a yard sale you're already having. Maybe you have other ideas that are more suited to your talents. We appreciate anything you can do to help us with this extra expense.
1 naught
"What's wrong? I haven't seen you for three weeks!"
I have used Distress inks Seedless preserve, Milled lavender, Peeled paint, Pine needles, Crushed olive and Walnut stain. The stamps are Marion Emberson Butterfly kisses and Hero arts Anytime messages.
While science has explained this away as mundane phenomenon, I like the movie’s interpretation that the sparks from the Aborigines’ fire ceremony took off through the atmosphere and into orbit to help out John Glenn’s capsule—that the old gods don’t look disapprovingly on man’s latest adventures—
Maggie: "Udder minute go?" (Where did my other mitten go?)
3. Visit a museum or an art gallery. Looking at art always gives me the urge to paint. Seeing art works “in the flesh” is different from browsing mere reproductions. You can see the texture and feel the touch of the artist.
I wash my hair, leave it in the towel while I apply my make up (say, for 10 minutes). I then apply my Phytomist on the mid-lengths and ends. Tresseme 24 hour body spray is applied to the roots and an orange- sized blob of 24 hour body mousse is applied throughout the mid-lengths and ends. I then dry the roots with my head upside down to add some lift, I also dry the rest a little so its not dripping wet!
There's always the beer, the scenery, the music, the castles, men in kilts, and of course great ideas for good books and fabulous book boyfriends! But my favorite thing? Definitely the scenery. There aren't many places you can go that look like this
Jeffrey Laing, PhD, SantaFe.com
We start working. This time I’m on dispatch section breaking down the pallets into different postal regions and labelling the boxes individually. A very hard and physically draining task as anyone there can vouch for but I had pleasant surprise to turn around and see a familiar face alongside the troops, busy working away was the chairman himself, Nick Griffin.
1 firing
Now when are you moving the rest of your things out of the house?
I know these prices are ridiculous for most people, but I'm a makeup artist and can write this stuff off. Still, I'm curious...Would you spend $65 on mascara? Am I crazy for even thinking about it?
and shutting all his eyes
‘Our houses are protected by the good Lord and a gun, you might meet ‘em both if you show up here not welcome son’, a line from Josh Thompson’s song “Way Out Here”, is the best line in a song ever! You may think Josh is new, but he’s been paying his dues in Nashville for quite a while.
Cyclists like Moyle and Hutchings cite a lack of both bike lanes and bike parking as a major component of what’s missing from Hamilton’s cycling infrastructure. Daryl Bender, project manager, alternative transportation with the City of Hamilton, says the new multi-use trail over Highway 403 (an extension of the Hamilton-Brantford Rail Trail completed in fall 2011) has an average daily usage of more than 300 cyclists and pedestrians per day.
Dollop the mixture into the tin, smooth the surface so it's evenly spread and pop it in the oven for 40/45 mins. Have a peek around the 35 minute mark and check it's done by seeing if you press down gently with your finger and it bounces back. The cake, not your finger.
Stupidity?
The same criminologists MacDonald falsely cites learned long ago that this movement wouldn't happen as she says they said it would.
Routed to the filter cutoff, this creates a classic bubbly synth sound. Better synths have more than one LFO. Really good ones have two or three per note.
Just like Mitt Romney helped all those people he was involved in laying off while with Bain Capital to “succeed?” That was quite a “boost” Mitt gave to them … right out the door.
Not so with the "water-efficient" front-loading washing machine we bought two years ago.
listen to gareth’s show on 5fm on thursday to hear more about tour dates. but this is one i WILL NOT miss! even if i have to travel to the karoo to see them!
Truth is, I seldom make time to share digitally. Truth is, I honestly believe that when I share I offer the bits of what I know and offer a space for others to interact and to learn and to provide me much needed feedback. Sharing fosters growth. Sharing is a commitment to my willingness to grow. Rats. Truth is, isn’t that what I wish for and push my kids to do every single moment?
dash of salt and pepper
In a large saucepan, combine the remaining milk with the heavy cream, sugar, corn syrup and cinnamon over medium heat. Whisking occasionally, bring the milk mixture to a boil, then reduce heat slightly and simmer, about 2 minutes. Off the heat, gradually whisk in the cornstarch mixture. Return to a boil (watch carefully so it does not boil over) and whisk over medium heat until the mixture is slightly thickened, about 1 minute.
Eyeballs
Her use of language includes heavy slang and she frequently uses English words and phrases while speaking in Icelandic. (In her public appearances at the Eurovision Song Contest, she spoke entirely in English.)
Had its lid glued shut.
Then I thought if I'm just having a couple table spoons of milk on my cereal, why not make the switch to skim?
Anyway, there it is in a nutshell!
On an entertainment street some bars are used for pills and others for cocaine and most door staff are pumped up on steroids. The drug goes with the music. The coke-heads are hyper and constantly making a sort of chewing motion. The staff of these bars put Vaseline on lavatory cisterns to try to stop customers doing lines of coke on them but the owners are usually on it themselves and door staff are often dealers.
But motivation has even subtler nuances.By using these tools and formulas, you can always modify the existing plans according to your body type and needs, provided you follow the tips given below, that’s the beauty of using these tools.The trans fats found in baked products, and saturated fats found in red meat, and dairy products can be harmful if eaten often.In that department too, I have tried my best to simplify everything by including some tools that automates the whole process.BMI or the Body Mass Index is a way to determine the body fat in terms of height and weight of the person.
Then today, watching tv, I hear the song from the musical card I bought him for Valentine’s Day last year. It made me want to dance with him. So what did I do? I bought it on my I-Phone so I can torture myself with it for the next few weeks, and then he’ll be home and we can dance to it. Speaking of torturing myself with music, I need to just stop playing music until Chase comes home because it all makes me think of him. I either want to dance, or there is a memory associated with it, or it’s one of his favorites. There’s one song I keep playing all the time that covers the first two very well. But it’s the song I play nearly every time I start playing songs. “Six-Pack Summer”. As winter has finally really left the great state of Alaska, the first verse is perfect: “The winter sure was cold and miserable cooped up, shoved dow baby it was pitiful. Anyhow it’s over now we owe it to ourselves to have a little fun.” Yes, I love Alaska even in the winter, and I’m sure in a few months I’ll be ready for it all over again. But currently I’m over it, so I’m feeling those lyrics. However, by the time you get to the chorus “Sing to me babe, I’ll be your dashboard drummer. Turn the radio up as loud as it can go.” I’m transported to another time. June 2001, riding around Cleveland in my new-to-me car windows rolled down with Chase at the wheel, radio blaring this song. What makes this memory so poignant? We got married June 2001. It also happened to be the first summer we spent together. School was out, normally we went our separate ways, but that summer we got married, we were finally together forever. And being in that memory, all I want to do I grab Chase and dance and share the memory together. By the end of the song my heart aches for missing him. Yet, I torture myself with that song at least once a day, often more because “the winter sure was cold and miserable.”
I have this recurring dream.
"A maiden born when autumn leaves
See this summary of the past four years, from “Warrior in Chief” by Peter L. Bergen (Director at the New American Foundation), an op-ed in the April 28 New York Times.
The book opens into Adam’s memory of a pivotal moment in his life—the summer of 1942, where, as a young boy he is about to begin school, learn English, and thus take his initial tentative steps away from his German-speaking Mennonite family and their self-imposed cultural and geographic isolation in Northern Alberta. At chapter’s end his mother’s plaintive call echoes through the evening, and the decades, summoning his childhood self to dinner or bed. It’s a call home, as well, to one who may have lost his way. “A-a-da-a-am,” she cries, “Where a-a-re you?”
Various witness accounts say a group of between 50 and 100 people moved down Valencia St. smashing windows, throwing paint balls, and even attacking an unsuspecting police station. The cops were apparently not prepared to make mass arrests and were slow to respond to the chaos, though it quickly broke up. The blog, Mission Local, has a good round up of the scene from last night.
Cuisine: Salads, Seafood, Chips and Queso (see recipe)
I did apologize to a woman I hurt a few years back. I wrote a note to her on Facebook. But she never replied. I suppose she is not over it.
Wooden Flourishes : Flourish Vine by Kaisercraft
-A magnetic wind-up car that rolls up the side of the fridge
That's how it goes
19. ZERO EFFECT (1998)
A list of past and current design team experience (previous design team experience is not required)
Many people think they would be happier, if only they had……
While Edward was in Normandy, it is believed he promised the throne of England to his cousin, William, Duke of Normandy. It is also believed he promised the throne to many others, including Harold Godwinson, son of the powerful Earl of Wessex. Harold was crowned the same day King Edward died in the newly built Westminster Abbey. In October 1066, William the Conqueror invaded England on the pretext that he was promised the throne and was the true heir. King Harold was killed at the Battle of Hastings. Thus the history of England was changed forever by the great nephew of Emma of Normandy.
I'm a second-rate pimp, but a good buckaroo.
Zoës Kitchen was founded in 1995 and currently has about 60 locations in 12 states.
I don't want my kids to be afraid of water, even though their mother can't swim.
You’re not exactly instilling a lot of confidence in me. That’s the last thing I want to hear, next to going under the knife and hearing, “What’s that,” before the anesthesia kicks in.
When disease incidence statistics publicized by state health departments do not match those published by federal health agencies, there is something wrong. It is time for California health officials to fully disclose complete details of the 1500 whooping cough cases they allege have occurred in the state during the past year, including how many cases were lab confirmed as B. pertussis; how many cases were classified as “epidemiologically linked” - which means they were NOT lab confirmed; and the ages and vaccination status of all cases, including whether people with suspected or confirmed cases had been given 1,2,3,4,5,6 or more pertussis shots.
Here are some pics of the night. I feel sorry for Harriet's teachers' friends and family. They must have worked themselves to the bones making these costumes, and putting everything together for these kids. The parents helped a lot too, but I know that hundreds of hours were farmed out to others.
My awesome friend Linzi tagged me in this fun little quiz so I can talk more about myself. Whee!
A printable recipe is at the bottom of this post.
Microsoft New Zealand country manager Paul Muckleston told NBR that so far Windows Phone smartphones have been a hit with a niche audience. Nokia was still the largest mobile phone maker overall (see second table). The Nokia-Microsoft partnership would help Microsoft’s mobile software pushing into the mainstream, and revive Nokia’s smartphone fortunes.
have nothing to say. The
I love her mysteries and am drawn to the fact that she can stump me time and time again, simply because I missed the tiniest of clues or was not paying attention to all of the facts. I devoured every single one of her novels and enjoyed most of them. I have never had a problem re-reading them, even if I do know who the murderer is, as I can pay attention to the clues and how I missed them, and how I was led astray. It's a lot of fun to figure out.
Welcome to the 5th edition of The Pulse -- The State of the Art -- a survey in words and pictures of the online artist community. The Pulse is a collaborative project that aims to introduce you to new artists, help you get to know familiar faces even more, and allow you access into the creative hearts and minds of a very talented crew of individuals. More than 130 artists have answered a series of questions which make up The Pulse. Their responses will be presented in a series of online posts which will run every Sunday.
Sorry that, when no one in the world was on your side, I sided with the world.
Some of you will have read how poor Hairband not only had a hairband wrapped around his waist but also how he was found caught on a nail. If you didn't read then simply scroll down.
Pets Help to Lower Health Care Costs People with pets actually make fewer doctor visits, especially for non-serious medical conditions. (National Institute of Health Technology Assessment Workshop: Health Benefits of Pets)
Raspberry Lemon Muffins
Despite my one week where I was down in the dumps and really slacked, I still had a very strong month of training in April! I did slightly more than in March. I am continuing to remain injury-free, which is a huge goal of mine when it comes to training!
At 2 pm, exactly 48 hours after I started the test (you can get your "unofficial" results 48 business hours after you test-- for a $7.95 fee), I checked the website of the company that administered the test, and it told me that my results were available. I paid my $7.95 and got my results: Pass.
This thing “cooks all day while the cook’s away.”
1) We have a small house on a small lot. Our 1400 square foot home is on a lot that's only 0.06 acres. You can imagine the house takes up most of the lot.
It is bleak. I fact I would consider this one of the bleakest books I’ve ever read. Mary’s world is one from the Dark Ages, all the glories and wisdom of our world of science and knowledge has been left far far behind and long forgotten. It is a world where the Sisterhood rule with an iron, inflexible will and to defy them is to risk being abandoned beyond the fence and amongst the Unconsecrated.
The round ends with Marx up on top. That round might go to Marx, but it was close.
My personal favorite segment was also cut, though I really didn’t expect it to make the show. A message to parental and insane conservative groups about violent and mature content in video games. The video featured some of the most graphic content from video games. A memorable scene was from Saints Row: The Third as a women runs amuck impaling baddies with her big purple dildo. The segment had a profound deep yet shallow ideological and psychological message causing one to question the implications of virtual morality.
Still, I’m looking forward to going back to the city where Stephen Foster wrote Oh Susannah, maybe some of the great songwriter’s magic will rub off on me.
my cricut
DOWN a size?? Are you f*&*king kidding me??
One student attended a workshop on Yin Yoga at Samdhana Karana Yoga, which I had planned to attend but was not able to due to the delivery of a vital piece of home equipment, a clothes washer. Being the solo student, she shared with me some insight about her low lunge. Every time she comes into low lunge, as many of us teach, she had pain in the hip of the forward leg. The advice she received and, later, shared with me was simple and beautiful: allow the forward-leg knee to cant out or walk the foot out away from center line. She showed ecstasy in sharing that because not only did she feel the benefits of the pose but found out that it was okay to be that way. She was given the okay to be how she needed to be to enjoy and explore her yoga. Concurrently, her husband has a stiff back that stays a little rounded in DFD; she said that he was very happy to find out that it was okay. What delightful reminders to play and explore yoga and, simultaneously, be content in the present.
King might express himself rather differently…
I want to be beautiful. I need to be happy with who I see in the mirror. Inner beauty is a joke and no argument will convince me otherwise.
THE ORGANIZATION MAD's got a boffo Kelly Freas cover (tho no actual Alfred E grin guaranteed to sucker at least 100,000 early-sixties adolescent geeks into buyin' the thing!) and innards that reprint some of the earliest post-Harvey Kurtzman material at a time when you could see the shakiness in transition from Kurtzman's particular "chicken fat" style to Al Feldstein's more sleek, cosmopolitan humor vision. This 'un also contains some of Jack Davis' last MAD work before he joined up with just about every imitation in sight willing to milk his rep before returning to the fold a good decade later, and although it ain't as finely detailed as the stuff he was doing for HUMBUG (as well as some of his earlier MAD work) it's sure eye-grabbing. No Elder in sight, but there's a lotta Wally Wood which helps not forgetting the newcomers along the lines of George Woodbridge (who was better off doing westerns at Atlas), Bob Clarke and of course Don Martin who was at least two years away from perfecting his famous bulbous-nosed style which we all remember him best by.
In the 9th Paara, 7th Chapter-Surah-al-Araaf, Verse206, one will find the first verse about Sajda (prostation).
I didn’t pack anything for my princess to play with, but wow how just the sand can entertain a 2 and a 1/2 year old! She ran herself silly, in and out of the sea, made sand castles with her ice lolly and even tried eating the sand after face planting it a few times…
Named after the legendary BBC television children’s programme dating back to the 1950s, The Bill & Ben Partnership is George Amos and Paul Ragan, Englishmen who live in South Wales. Ragan established his own insurance business which he sold several years ago
Over time we conditioned ourselves to keep our discussions and conversations internal, again, for the most part. There are those times of intense debate or great excitement when we bubble forth into vocalization, but they are few and far between. With the arrival of blue tooth all problems were solved; just snap a piece of plastic to the body’s ear and talk out loud whenever we wanted.
Insert pointless picture to illustrate the above:
when I once wrote a paper about Harajuku street fashion a few years ago. His designs draw from gothic, punk, Lolita, and visual kei styles, to name a few. Elegant and austere, he brings a new type of demure element to an otherwise grungy or childish fashion style.
1) Heat oven to 375 degrees. Cook bacon as desired until crisp. Drain on paper towel; crumble bacon and set aside.
Tesco built a huge supermarket on the edge of town and it has sucked all the retail business from the local shops.
I have to say I've never ventured in to the wax strip world. I've purchased several of the heat up pots of wax, only to throw them out in the end. I've been known to sit down on the floor, wax in hand, and to prepare a generous strip for hair removal, only to slink into the bathroom to soak it off in a hot shower. Perhaps years of brazillians (no, I will never attempt doing this at home) have made me braver or at least more accustomed to the pain or perhaps at home waxing kits have improved, but I didn't find these all that painful. No, it didn't tickle, but it was certainly tolerable.
We wanted to meet with you as a part of the requirement for the course, and frankly, we hoped it could be a mutual learning experience. We are very curious about discourse analysis; however we can forego this meeting.
Even though it's in the 50's in Richmond, there's Christmas magic in the air.
Exhilarating, eye-popping, full color snapshots capture these critters in action, often showing off the squirrels’ most “adorable” features—fluffy tails, soft belly fur, almond brown eyes, and expressive faces. Be prepared to read this book to your preschooler again and again. Youngsters will find this introductory peek at a-day-in-the-life-of-a- squirrel fascinating and fun!
Although I've judged at many beer festivals and events I've never been chief judge.
Few soldiers, minus their jousting sticks, sharp pointy things, guns, willingly
I don't have a card for you this week - instead I would like to show you a new colouring technique. Unfortunately I can't take credit for it which makes me a bit annoyed that I couldn't come up with it. The reason is because it derives from an arttechnique called pointillism and having an education in arthistory, well, you get the idea.
Here's my problem, however: listening to Christmas songs triggers something in my organism. I get the Christmas bug. My mind functions like a flowchart: Christmas songs leads to Christmas decorations leads to Christmas baking leads to peppermint leads to peppermint cookies.
My fingers are lycra ice-skaters in the same skirted troop. They’ll keep on with their cantilever until an unsheathed blade finds the jugular.
After my chat with the expat in Australia, I decided to pay his Afrikaans-speaking parents a visit. The old man was sick in bed but the old lady, eager to hear news from her expat son, invited me to sit down. She looked frail and quite tense but once the ice was broken she shared the following horrific experience with me:
Okay, okay… I know like every art snob and his/her brother is totally having a boner about this movie, and it was… you know… kinda good. That’s… that’s about all I can say about it. Gosling was good, I suppose. Albert Brooks is apparently already clearing space on his mantle. It has Brian Cranston, who is awesome. It has Carey Mulligan, who is also awesome. It has all the makings of an awesome movie, except for being an awesome movie. It was fine, but you know… I never have to see it again.
OMWord what a fantastic piece of art! Every inch of your creation is AMAZING! The details are wonderful, the shape is stunning & your coloring is phenomenol. Just when I think I saw every inch, out pops another intricate detail! Congrats, please email Roberta your choice of three images and you are invited to be our guest designer for next weeks challenge!
Get a Second Life
There was a catch, however. Before I could turn in my application, I had to complete a math/mechanical test at their office. It has been more than 3 years since I have taken a math course, but I didn’t think the test was going to be that bad.
The food festival is probably the worst event ever in the history of the universe. I liken the food festival to trying to use the restroom at a sporting event during halftime or directly after the game.
Oklahoma
But I don't have anything as dramatic as losing over 200 pounds or a child sick with cancer, who wants to hear from me?
I added a kangaroo pocket to this one.
You could only buy Easter Eggs and Hot Cross Buns at Easter time....
I could see he suddenly began to question the wisdom of starting this conversation. ‘Yep’, I continued, ‘that means two meals and two baths on two days every weekend’.
Romans 8 will offer the good news of the Gospel of Jesus Christ. Within that chapter we find that we have hope and that hope comes through Jesus Christ. We also find that verse 9 reveals to us that we can have victory through the power of the Spirit of God which lives in us. But notice that in Romans 8:12 (NIV) there is a part here that we have in this process. “Therefore, brothers, we have an obligation--but it is not to the sinful nature, to live according to it.” The “it’ here is that we have an obligation to live according to the Spirit. We are commanded to walk in the Spirit, live in the Spirit, and to pray in the Spirit. I believe the Bible is clear; we are justified by the blood of Jesus Christ, we are saved by grace and grace alone, but our sanctification, our life-long process of becoming like Christ, involves our participation as the Spirit of God leads us.
20. January 2009 @ Café De La Danse 5, passage Louis Philippe
Take a Ride In a Hot Air Balloon
1 Rock And Roll
3. Graceling by Kristin Cashore - Wouldn't this make a fascinating movie? Action, adventure, romance, mystery, tough heroine...it's perfect!
Example: Fellow fan: “Hah! I can’t believe we’re playing Vanderbilt!” You: “I’ve had just about enough of your Vassar-bashing, young lady!”
THEN, S1 lands the BOOM. If I had this info at the beginning when the "what should we do" question was first posed my answer would likely have been different.
On the other hand, we intuitively judge people based on what they can be reasonably expected to do. We feel the need to give a person an "out". If we simply condemn people no matter what they do, our condemnations will fail to encourage better behavior. Gelato guy is just going to throw up his hands, because there is no way he can earn PZ's forgiveness.
The above example is the most glaring but not the most significant one among many for Romeny to provide a vision of what a his White House would be like – specifically to provide a positive image of a Presidency that connects with real people. There is no need to attack Obama directly – the message should be positive - depicting Mitt as a person of the people – one who will conduct the affairs of his administration with utmost respect and regard for those citizens whom he serves – truly a government of the people, by the people and for the people.
Robin Murphy: Oh yes, it is available in libraries, through retailers (book stores), and of course, on-line. Basically everywhere.
You can see much more of the footage by doing a goggle search for Queensland Floods 2011 or Brisbane Floods and also on Youtube.com, there are lots of other videos there that will blow your mind. Massive fast flowing rivers suddenly taking over the main street. People didn't have any time to get out of it's way as it just came out of nowhere, taking people walking down the street, taking people in their cars and flooding business after business down the main street.
When ‘No’ is directed at us … ‘No, I do not agree!’ … ‘No,you can not have that! ‘… ‘No, you are WRONG!’… ‘No, that isn’t acceptable’ … we hate it. We feel as if we have been attacked. When ‘No’ is in answer to something we want – we feel we are being denied something precious; ‘No’ is taking something away from us. Each time ‘No’ is used in this way – we feel diminished and treat it as a death.
I HATE SLOW WALKERS. People who stop and longingly gaze into a shop window full well knowing there's people behind them trying to get past. People who walk so slow and meander just to stop you from getting around you. People with pushchairs and kids that really should be on leashes. Just people in general. If it didn't make me sound like a total nutjob, I'd say it was a conspiracy against me being able to walk more than 0.2mph.
30. Ten Feet Tall and Bulletproof -- Travis Tritt
I started to delete them singularly at the post comment site but it would have taken forever, so I resorted to the comment section of my dashboard and found 765 of these comment posts littered through three years of posts.
I don't care how pretty she is, I just can't warm to Lynsey. There's still something I don't trust about her.
Level 12: MP Cost: 10, Damage: 300%, Attacks up to 5 enemies.
Who is your favourite character from Zed and why?
I see that no other than his long time guitarist, and Soprano's whack specialist, Little Steven is coming to talk at the conference. Surely he'll squeeze in a secret show somewhere, or at least broadcast his Underground Garage Radio show somewhere.
- Each gallon of gas sold in 2010 generated … two … cents … of profits for Exxon.
But we were now married---this was our wedding night----SPECIAL
The question has come up plenty of times regarding me becoming a therapist, but really? I’d be a god awful therapist. I can only do this because I don’t have to play therapist, I can say some really messed up shit and get away with it. Let me give you an example or two.
Born January 27, 1930, Rosemark, Tennessee. Moved to Memphis 1948. Played with Billy 'Red' Love and other influential Delta musicians. First recording was Dry Up Baby (Modern 848). Entered Armed Services 1952, joined Johnny Ace Revue after discharge, having signed with Duke Records. First smash hit, It's My Life Baby, 1955 followed by years of consistent success in R&B market.
St. Paul put it this way: “… the law of the Spirit of life has set you free in Christ Jesus from the law of sin and death.” (Rom 8:2)
The craft night was great, and everyone's Dahlia pin was a reflection of their personality. I loved it! We had lots of fellowship and chocolate to help us enjoy the night even more!
Wandering around the idea of going back to school, lately.
It was then that inspiration struck, I suppose, everything went awry and my plan was foiled by my own need to do something creative in an attempt to work myself out of the crappiness rut I've been in. I didn't really want to make any stinkin' 16-patch blocks. If you happened to catch my guest post over at Generation Q Magazine, you know that I got to see at lot of crazy-inspiring people at Market in Houston. I've been wanting to try Rayna Gillman's technique of creating a free-form quilt ever since her schoolhouse. Unfortunately, I didn't have any UFOs to cut up (because I'm a serial finisher) and I also don't have her book (yet), so I had to wing it.
I said, “Yes, I think he will get the GOP nomination. Yes, I would vote for him.”
Bit of a catch 22, I think.
and gets all excited when she sees her big sisters walk in the room.
The viciousness of the official animus toward the indigent can be breathtaking. A few years ago, a group called Food Not Bombs started handing out free vegan food to hungry people in public parks around the nation. A number of cities, led by Las Vegas, passed ordinances forbidding the sharing of food with the indigent in public places, leading to the arrests of several middle-aged white vegans.
Adding:
O’Hanlon expects to fill the open position in the coming weeks.
Happy love day everyone!
winter is practically here for us in England. cold, cold, cold. at least, it is for me. but while I've been dead/MIA, beautiful things have happened. little things that make your weeks that much more special.
Little chance for recovery.
So that in all things, as is aforesaid: the Unity in Trinity, and the Trinity in Unity is to be worshipped.
Sure, having seen the film twice before on DVD, I was already well acquainted with its jump cuts, its Tradition of Quality-subverting documentary style of Raoul Coutard's cinematography, its obsession with American genres, its daringly distended second-act hotel-room seduction, and its cool and playful tone. All of that was as familiar to me as, say, a mural I couldn't help but stare at for hours on end.
1. When rearranging every cupboard and drawer in (his) house, be sure to tell him where you've organized said things.
And, now, the evidence. I’ll let you decide. Is there creativity at large, or am I getting AA Hubby in trouble again?
I was pretty excited to check out Glassworks Louisville's walk-in workshop and see what they had to offer, so Kyle and I headed over there with plans to distract ourselves from all the Ironman hoopla. Unfortunately, the experience wasn't as fun and relaxing as we had hoped, but we still managed to get a few good pieces made and have a couple of chuckles along the way. Below are some pictures from our crafty adventure.........
They were one of the first groups formed in the 1970′s that would
And for once this isn’t my usual pathetic plea for comments to give me a sense of self-worth (well, it’s not just that). I’d be most intrigued to know.
I know plenty of women who kick up their heels together on a girls’ trip. Heck, I think they made a movie about it — a little picture called “Bridesmaids.”
Chelsea change: And it is a necessary one, as Mata replaces the frustrating Sturridge.
Tapper: you are against two of my favorite wars
This past year, I seen that more and more our teaching rests on the simply principles of the commandments. As we teach our members the importance of following God’s law, I find myself zeroing into the importance of worship on Sunday, neglecting the rest part of the fourth law.
And this handwritten confession has been underlined in key places–passages that describe the repurposed hotel/prison, its layout, the timing of the guards, everything you might need to know, in short, if you were planning a rescue mission.
Mercy Gallagher Teague is a performing poet from Tulsa. She was the Tulsa City-County Library’s 2006 Unpublished Poetry Prize Winner, and was published in Write Bloody Publishing’s The Good Things About America in 2008. She’s been a featured reader at Heller Theater and the Southwest Conference on Literature and Christianity. She can be found at myspace.com/mgtpoetry and youtube.com/user/mgtpoetry.
You look so gorgeous in the moodlight
made no impact in the lives of those around them; there was just nothing
Minty (short for Araminta) has a simple life. She loves roller derby, spending time with her best friend Paz and annoying her older sister, Thea. But lately things are getting complicated. Paz is starting to spend more time with these other girls and leaving Minty out. Plus, there are all these weird things happening in the neighborhood—things are disappearing and there’s this weird boy taking pictures of people. And then Minty finds the tree.
Anyway, now I’m going to further erode my Yankee credentials by saying this.
Or what if you have a photoblog or just post artwork? It still works the same--creativity is creativity no matter what you do.
"Because of the problems encountered previously with this particular episode, the acting group CEO Mr Gab Mampone in his capacity as editor-in-chief will need to make the final sign-off."
Bogota (around Christmas) reminded us of Regent St in London! It was beautifully decorated as well as markets and singing on the main street. We also did a trip to the Salt Cathedral in Zipaquira.
A hands-on training focusing on building content-managed, e-commerce web site using the award-winning Joomla Platform
(Squinting)
The bathroom is from the NYC loft of (now? then?) Deputy Decorating Editor, Rebecca Robertson.
After your class eats lunch, get them to sort their waste. Does it all need to go in the trash? What can be composted, recycled or reused? Is there anything we could do to avoid the trash that’s left over?
Who saw his Master in the sky,
So, the banks, through the bailouts, have transferred their bad debt to the citizens of these countries and walked away with their money, leaving the poor suckers of the EU to pick up the tab plus all the accumulated interest owed. No wonder the bankers want Greece to take the next bailout - then they can finally be guaranteed all their money back, even though it was THEM who made the bad investments in the first place. Socialism via the banking system - and the rich get richer...
This afternoon at about 15h30 Bush Radio trainees were alerted that members of the South African Police Service (SAPS) had stopped and were searching a vehicle just outside its building in Salt River.
So first I had to get a side shot of you know who...which was easier said then done.
And on occasion, I remember how she told me I had magic powers, because she did feel better that day. There are times, I think I know what she meant by that. But sometimes, I wish I could get my mojo working to make it where she was better in the context of not being sentenced such a treacherous and imprisoning shell. Perhaps that would be the most amazing magic trick of all.
The other thing about the meeting is, could you tell me why I am required to meet with both of you, given that other students have had, as I requested, the ordinary courtesy of a one-on-one meeting with you or Kathy?
But the problem is that Heritage chicken is from Kansas. Shouldn't I be buying local products? Should I buy Rosie's chicken from nearby Petaluma even though on her blog, Dairy Queen commented "“Rosie is a free range chicken, allowed to run and forage outdoors in an open-air, fenced area outside the barn.” Note use of the word “allowed,” as opposed to, say, “encouraged.” When Michael Pollan visited Petaluma Poultry, he saw not a single bird outside either time"? Or should I add to the air polution problem by driving over to Berkeley for my bird?
But that’s not enough proof. So let me begin a short list of my nerd qualifications (I will be preparing a nerd resume eventually, but, to date, I don’t have that ready).
Why have I been bouncing off of bumpers? One reason: to numb the pain. Fill in the blanks. If you are an adult, you know what kind of self-medicating options are out there to try. I have tried many, thank you. Another reason: in hopes of being wanted. Fill in the blanks. If you are an adult, you know what it feels like to be “wanted” in several forms. I wasn’t wanted twice by my birthparents. That was hard to swallow. So, I have gone wherever I was potentially wanted. Another reason: I lost my rudder of “your birthparents loved you soooo much.” That was a truth in my life revealed to be a lie; and believe me, I still hold out hope that I am wrong. I hope beyond all hope that they really do love me soooo much. Yet, to me, loving your family looks very different from what I have experienced to date with my birthfamily; but I will probably still always keep hoping.
If you go for a reading and they say they can’t or won’t read for you, ask them why it is. Don’t go off worrying yourself sick that you’re about to die as no one would want you to be so upset, it will often just be they haven’t explained the reasons to you very well or at all. It isn’t a regular occurence by any means, but it can happen and if you are the sort who goes for readings regularly, you’ll probably have it happen to you one day.
My weight is hovering around 80-82kg. I have been this weight most of my adult life. While it is so much better than being between 100-102kg I'm still 10kg short of my goal. I feel fat and ugly. I feel like I'm aging so fast now. I feel like I've wasted the best years of my life being fat. Who cares if I'm a bit overweight when I'm old? Now is when it matters. Especially seeing as I'd like to find a 'mate'. And I don't want a fat partner either. I think it is disgusting if I'm honest. My gut, my legs, my arse, my arms. Fucking disgusting. I find it completely repellent on a man too. I'm not saying I need a perfect Michelle Bridges 12 fucking wbt body. Just a normal size 12 would be awesome. Why the fuck then can't I stick to any diet? Why do I shove that chocolate in my gob, order that ice cream, buy those lollies, bake those chocolate chip bikkies? Why?
Surely the hottest trend these days is social media, Facebook, Twitter and such. Barry Libert has written Social Nation ($24.95, Wiley) that is subtitled “How to harness the power of social media to attract customers, motivate employees, and grow your business.” This is surely worth exploring before you rush headlong into creating a profile and start tweeting and blog posting. This book will teach you how to avoid the pitfalls and to make a strong online impact. Hardly a day goes by without news of someone getting into trouble for a blog post or tweet. Stories of how social media has generated success are also common. Libert is the CEO of Mzinga, a company that provides social software to businesses. It is his job to be social media savvy. Another excellent book about making money on the Internet is Jim F. Kukral’s Attention! This Book Will Make You Money—How to Use Attention-Getting Online Marketing to Increase Your Revenue ($24.95, John Wiley & Sons). And with a title like that, what more do you need to know about the book? Actually, the title tells you a lot about the marketing moxie of Kukral, but he can back it up and does in a book that can help anyone starting a business, expanding or revamping an existing one, or hunting for the latest marketing techniques. Over the past fifteen years, the author has help big businesses and small. The book is filled with no-nonsense advice and guidance that anyone can use as the nation and the world transition to the Web as an extraordinary marketing tool.
The sign at the Kettering Road entrance to the town was changed to Meerkat Harborough at 9.30am and was meant to stay up all day.
Today I lost a very, very dear friend. She was my "2nd Momma" when I was young. Then again, I think she was everyone's Momma that would let her take on the role, but she had a special gift for making you feel like she was there for YOU! Every time I have gotten a promotion I've thought, boy would Rose be proud. When someone says I'm a good leader of "Brainstorming" sessions, I know that came directly from Rose. When I needed to choose a name for my daughter, I tried Rose with each name to see if it would fit as a middle name. My Grandmother's name won the spot in the end, but it took a coin-toss to settle it. THAT is how much this lady meant to me.
Door of Duncan Grant's bedroom, designed and painted by Vanessa Bell
A bit of background. Littlest daughter has just started big school, I'd been kind of looking forward to/dreading (depending on the mood swing that day) having time to myself.
Do something, friends, lift this pall of despair
The Shallow Pond Gets Deeper
PROOF IN THE PUDDING
26 And as the king of Israel was passing by upon the wall, there cried a woman unto him, saying, Help, my lord, O king.
City living means we're a one car family and while Brumhilda (yes, that's her name) never let us down, she was old and when old cars go wrong parts can be hard to source. Plus, old cars have more ailments than newer younger models.
69ish HealWave values
The Court of Appeal appear to conflate ‘data’ in Article 1 with ‘contents’ in Article 3. If that is correct, then the football list makers never select or arrange at all. They do not start by coming up with the fixtures and then list them chronologically. The first thing they do is generate a list of dates and then arrange the teams and venues within them.
The campaign manager was escorted in and King Herod filled him in on what was happening. All three went to the blackboard where they had devised so many other successful campaigns.
A Metal Hen Family to take pride of place in the centre of the table... or a pair for each end... I have something very similar and decorate with flowers and eggs around them...
It’s Manhattan. A viral plague called Blacklight is spreading. The infected become grotesque behemoths on uncontrollable manhunts for the uninfected. You’re an amnesiac mutant, enabled with the power of shape-shifting and absorbing others (known as “consuming”), as well as tremendous power that even allows you to climb up buildings effortlessly. What kind of person are you? You are Alex Mercer, the star of Radical Ent.’s hit of summer 2009, Prototype. Despite its gameplay similarities to other games, it was a critical and commercial success, having enough sales to be inflicted into the Xbox’s Hall of Platinum Hits. And, of course, after that there needed to be a second phase. And so that’s where Prototype 2 comes in, the super-heroic sci-fi sequel. In this game, a man named James Heller goes out to fulfill his goal of eradicating Blacklight, but also plans to terminate a person whom he believes is responsible for the death of his family in the virus outbreak: none other than Alex himself. James practically shares the exact same powers as Alex, although shape-shifting and consumption has become more tactical. Like, if James consumes a soldier, people’s reactions will show they want nothing to do with him. To prevent enemy overwhelm, Radical has included more down-to-earth AI, as well as weapon use, like fending off using a freshly-ripped tank cannon.
It will carry a selected library of intellectual property materials, including the text of the Statute of Monopolies and a copy of the BASS trade mark (the first to be registered), as well as more up-to-date materials such as a copy of the TRIPs Agreement and a full set of WIPO’s popular cartoon guides to IP law.
Several large fragments of thick, clear, ceramic glass are laid out on the floor before me. I proceed to fit the fragments together, though I do so without knowledge of how the end product should look; there is no picture, there is no guidebook. Thus I assemble the pieces together working towards an image of the end product as I see it in my head. I produce a lofty construct but the fragments don’t stick and it collapses, shattering into smaller pieces. I begin again — it collapses.
Pretty much the most creative cooking these get is going on the grill versus the microwave or stovetop. I need something new, fresh, exciting. New veggies to try, or new applications and flavor combinations for these veggies I already know and love!
In Rosamund's realm, happiness hinges on a few simple beliefs. For every princess there's a prince. The King has ultimate power. Stepmothers should never be trusted. And bad things come to those who break with Tradition....
Enjoy! :)
We catch up to Autumn in Tynda. The train had kept us warm for 36 hours due to a combination of the heater, our body temperatures and constant farting but stepping outside we smack into the bracing Siberian air. Our extremities are numb. A man wearing Cuban heels comes rushing towards us from behind, long strides like that of a stilt walker. He asks us a question that doesn't need to be asked. 'Are you the Australians?'
As delightful agent Ginger Clark passionately stated in the comments, Cobb salads are delicious. Still, I wouldn’t be overly concerned if someone was tired of eating them. In terms of an agent cracking a joke that they can figure out what 15% of any number is…okay, I’ve totally used the same joke a ton of times. I thought it was funny! But apparently I was shitting on people’s faces. Oops!
Bargain Album
I had read both of these books, years apart, back when they were new (or at least newer). So it's been a very long time (published in 1991 and 1999). So I was in for a couple of surprises when I decided to re-read them -- together -- for the Women Unbound reading challenge. I remembered that Margaret had become a priest and the general story line. But let me tell you about a couple of things that surprised me. Some of you may remember that I wrote about having a RE-birthday party to celebrate one year since my bypass surgery, which gave me new life and vitality. Exactly one week later, I started reading this book and found THIS on page 9:
The “Relive Every Single Fucking Mistake You Have Ever Made Until You Are Trapped Within Your Own Personal Hell” Hell
Today, as I write this, it is April 30th. It’s a regular day, the sun has been shining and all seems well and good in the world. What you wouldn’t know, especially as an “Ausländerin,” is that today is actually the day of terror. I remember last year that we sat in the dark and watched the town unfold into a world of chaos and panic!
"Yes!" (annoyed, exasperated).
There are other things, too. Weird questions keep popping up. Do we live near a church, for instance. I’ve never come across that one before, but apparently some poor souls inherited a house and found themselves with a vast bill for repairing the nave of the local church. Does anyone have rights to the trees, or the wildlife? And don’t ask me about radon gas.
Gore
John Michael Collins, 42, New York, N.Y.
Where: Em and Bill's
There I gave you My hand,
But the best part about it was stripping. As in stripping the covers off paperbacks to return them to the publishers, and we could have the books for free. The world was my oyster! So much to learn, so much to choose from – I could read Proust and Dickens and Austen and Plath, perfect for an English major like me. But more often than not, the naked books slipped into my purse were actually “Sweet Valley High” novels, and one book that has stayed with me in memory and every move from apartment to apartment: “I’m With the Band” by Pamela Des Barres.
Photos soon...ciao
I now find myself making "extra" visits...just to see my "sister"!
My only complaint is that Veet promises each strip can be used multiple times until the sticky runs out. I found it ran out with the first go. Perhaps this was because I apparently really need to exfoliate my legs, or it could be the formulation.
And while I'm not complaining, it's just that I have a desire to make Macie into a big sister. So then the question becomes: When?
Hi blog friends
4. I started my month with about $200 to pay over a thousand dollars worth of bills. (That was after I paid some of the other bills first. I don’t just have a $1,000 overhead.)
Serves 10 to 12
Use short words, short sentences, and short paragraphs.
This and this and this are exciting me write now. Yes, that was intentional, since writing this and writing that are what have eaten holes my brain during the new blog absence. If this thing were a child, it would have definitely withered away by now, having no mother to feed it and no loyal fans to tend it in my negligence.
Would the novelty of kaiten-zushi draw you in for a bite to eat?
Contentment is a heart issue. Therefore the secret to learning contentment lies in letting God change our hearts. Sometimes the pain of discontent is the only tool that will do the job.
Gene Von Troyer’s introduction jumps from topic to topic before finally summarizing Yamano Kōichi’s “three phases of Japanese science fiction” and settling into speculation concerning what makes Japanese science fiction “Japanese”:
Indeed we hall….
I’m just questioning the nearly unbearable agony of such a fantastic, cruel gift as I’m stuck in my forties trying to live a really healthy life. I intuitively know dealing with this rightly may indeed be the final surrender in a year of them. Check out the list of losses and letting go right here.
But it’s still the second ingredient after water—four teaspoons of it, in fact, in the form of high fructose corn syrup. The secret to keeping this beverage sweet-tasting, however, comes further on down, in the form of aspartame, acesulfame potassium, and sucralose.
But who is Malema talking to?
Yes. He’d written this out by hand! He also had a box that he drew on the edge of EVERY page, where he inserted various meta information, such as “restriction ends in 45 days”, “restriction ends in 35 days”, “don’t lose organizer”.
so now I deeply understand flea market is cool
Three Pines series by Louise Penny--read 4 out of 8 (series ongoing) Inspector Gamache gets called on to solve cases in the tiny Canadian town of Three Pines.
Blaring 90's pop music
Gregg Berger … Watch Commander
I can see morning cars.
I discovered that oilcloth can be a little tricky to work with - since you can't pin the fabric together without piercing the oilcloth - but by the 3rd bag, I started to get the hang of it.
Project complete! You now have a brand new stylish pair of shoes that will spruce up any outfit. Not to mention what a great conversation piece they are when you get to tell everything how you turned those shoes from shit to chic!
I take the train everyday, twice a day. Two different lines, so there's a stop in between... all-told, I chill in the station at least six times a day, which means one thing: More exposure to the crazies that call them home in the winter.
September 4 – Fort Collins, Mothership
My people are the glorious family that make it so hard to leave. My people are the encouraging friends who tell me –each in their own way - that I will be successful. My people include the wonderful colleague who coached me through a big presentation and gave me Belgium chocolates as a reward (Belgium chocolate!). My people are the dear friends who I call to say “You know, if anything happens, will you make sure E has all the details on things like boys and shoes and growing up strong?” Of course my people will.
An interesting session was hosted in London on Tuesday by the International Longevity Centre (ILC): Older workers, health and employment. While nothing overwhelmingly new came out of it, the keynote speech by Dame Carol Black in particular on trends in the health of older workers nevertheless created an impact.
-Most of the good jokes aren’t ruined in the trailer.
I went for the classics. I also went for beers which I knew could sit in my room for at least a year or two without having to worry about them going off. I went for Belgian beers like; Orval, Saison Dupont, St Bernardus ABT, Cantillon Gueuze and Boon Gueuze. German beers like; Weihenstephan Hefewiesse, Aventinus Eisbock and Schneider Hopfenweisse. American beers like; Anchor Old Foghorn and Goose Island Bourbon Count Stout. (just to note that's a pretty good list of ten beers...)
by withholding valuable information or technology or knowledge.
160ml sunflower oil
There is a nice smoothness to the beer which makes it go down pretty easy. My problem is with the smell of these types of beers. I really can't get past the skunky smell and it really hinders my experience with the beer. That is probably why it takes me about 4 years in between buying Carlsberg. The reason I bought it this time was to probably take me back to that trip to SF and remember all of the great times we had that week.
“Mum, Mum, did you hear? Did she tell you?” Lily-Rose jabbered, clambering astride Hayley and tucking herself into her body, “It was so much fun. I can’t wait to tell you everything. Thank you so much Aunt Hayley, it was an amazing surprise”
Stay up to date with our newsletter and check the blog regularly to hear about the personal experiences of our SIA staff, volunteers and with the people from the communities with whom we work. You will hear from our SIA staff, trip leaders, participants and members of the local communities.
Happy New Year to all readers of the Marco On The Bass blog! While 2011 was a stressful year for most people (continued job losses, mounting unemployment rates, continued home foreclosures) it's going to be very hard to top when it comes to ska. There was an unbelievable cornucopia of 2-Tone era band tours, shows, books, media coverage and new albums and music to enjoy. In fact, the amount of ska related developments came so fast and furious at times, it was hard to keep up because there was so much to write about. So in that time honored tradition of looking back at the year that was, here is my totally subjective, top 11 Marco On The Bass ska highlights countdown of 2011.
And as the kettle made the hissing sound in the spring afternoons
Here in paradise, there’s no sunshine today, and that matches my mood. For today is ANZAC Day, a special day for Australians and New Zealanders, and a special day for me too.
Forgive me but when the weather goes to extremes, it's hard to think about anything else. Just like this time last year, it has been super hot in Paris this week with the highs topping out around 90. Air conditioning is more of an idea than a reality. The only real way to cope is to dress lightly, stay hydrated, and keep out of the sun. And pity the poor dusty tourists who must do all to get the most out of their Paris vacation, including these two who at least found shade and comfortable place to sit beneath the Arc de Triomphe. I feel as crumpled and sweaty. At least I don't have to run around to see all the sights. Right now, soaking my feet, a cold drink, and a spot on the couch by the open window sounds just about perfect.
1059 ***D-VIII/27/1989. “Ethics and Technology: The Problem of Abortion and the Law.” World Conference on Ethical Choices in the Age of Pervasive Technology, Guelph University, Guelph, Ontario. (Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 399-406 (1992).)
Internally it will settle a nervous stomach and indigestion, as well as being very pleasant to drink. A tablespoon of hydrosol in a liter of seltzer is wonderfully refreshing. It could also be added to a pot of tea. It's flavor is distinctly lemon but not citrusy, and much less potent. Imagine it in desserts, or with seafood.
After altering them all I just added some decorations I thought was suitable, luckily Signe agreed ;) Some ribbon, lace, flowers, MIC chippies, buttons, and TH metal embellies found it´s way on to there.
In reality, in the adult world, we most of us do the work that is expected from us, whether as part of paid employment or as part of some other commitment such as family life. We are to work as if we were working for the Lord. Now, my little ones don't understand that yet. But if they develop the habit of working only when they want money and expect to be paid, they may have trouble transitioning later to that other attitude. (Or maybe not, if you handle it sensitively. I speak for myself here--I think I would have trouble helping them make that transition.)
Seriously? I mean, seriously, dude, does that kind of line ever work? Somehow I don't think so. So now, I've got the line of the convention and I'm going to repeat it until people's ears bleed. Because, you know, it wasn't enough that this moron insulted lesbians everywhere by assuming a pair of straight chicks hanging out at a convention were lesbians simply because they were not with this particular troll-like speciman of humanity. No clue who said dude was. All I need to know is this: what a loser.
Since my blog was posted several responses and developments lead me to think further about the essential issues, but not to change course.
we have had the opportunity to visit some beautiful places in the world.
It has been a blast though and I never thought we would have so much fun doing this. I spend a lot of time prancing like a duck and he spends a lot of time smacking my ass with bands. Or in workout terms he helps me with my weights and I help his yoga form. It has been something to do together without walking along next to one another on treadmills from hell. We push one another just a bit more and try not to puke on one another during plyometrics. Here is to the next 81 days.
We're off track this week and trying to keep things as normal as possible while we're under construction. Dinner is last minute and cooking is not an option!
Divide batter evenly among muffin pan cups, filling each 3/4 full. Place one slightly rounded teaspoon of the ganache filling on top of each cupcake.
However, staff didn’t feel the same and called security and police with officers from Tuggerah Lakes sending the police helicopter as well as attending the scene amid fears of an armed hold-up.
Paul spoke of a dividing point, or a separation that occurs in our minds. In Romans 8 he said that those who ARE according to the flesh set their minds on the things of the flesh and those who ARE according to the spirit, the things of the spirit. In thinking back, the assurances offered by the airplane verses the lack of assurance in my parachute seemed to represent that division.
Old Grudge Ender – David A. Riley
In a small glass bowl, melt 1 heaping cup of dairy-free chocolate chips with a ts. of coconut oil in the microwave for 30 seconds, then stir and melt again for another 30 seconds. Then after a minute of heat it should be easily stirred into a liquid form. Then add the peppermint oil and stir well. You can also melt your chocolate over boiling water if you prefer. When chocolate is liquid, you can drop each frozen mint topped cookie into the glass bowl and use a spoon or fork to fully cover the cookie with chocolate. Return the coated cookie to the parchment papered baking sheet. After you are done coating all of the cookies, you can use the remaining melted chocolate in the bowl to sprinkle over the cookies to add an extra touch of drizzled chocolate to the cookies. Then return the cookies to the freezer and let the chocolate coating harden for at least one hour before eating. Then after the coating is fully hardened you can keep the cookies in a container in the fridge or even leave in the freezer if you desire. This recipe will make about 2 1/2-3 dozen cookies depending on how large you make them and how many you sneak before you share with others :)
* "Don't say "no" to cross-border patent relief, says AG, say "nuance"", here. The Kat reviews the Opinion of the Advocate General in Case C 616/10 Solvay SA v Honeywell Fluorine Products Europe BV, Honeywell Belgium NV and Honeywell Europe NV.
My Chicken and Rice is basic..cooked chicken, water, a can of cream of chicken soup, a can of cream of celery, cut up celery, rice, and salt and pepper to taste.
I'm trying to figure out what my thoughts are this morning and it turns out I don't have many. Or I have too many...I'm not sure which it is.
All people don’t need to climb the ladder from the very bottom. Create and sell the businesses themselves not just the products and services they produce.
1. You'll discover a true hinterland haven
She added: “You can see girls in Newcastle clubs week after week with different footballers and I think, ‘You are so stupid’. Now I’m the stupid one.”
A few years ago, I was staying in a hotel in Warsaw. With an hour or so to spare, I started to flick through the television channels, and came across an international one broadcasting news and current affairs in English. I sat and watched; there were several extended reports about issues affecting the lives of people in various countries in eastern Europe, and I think further afield, too.
Cavan has kept his sorcerer’s powers a secret from their village, but now he promises Tanwen that if she truly wants to reunite with her beloved, he can summon a vampire to turn her. What he doesn’t tell her is that Peredur is not like other vampires. As a member of the Brotherhood, it is his task to stand between humans and vampires, ensuring one side doesn’t completely annihilate the other.
When a flood saves the Soggy Bottom Boys at the end of O Brother, Where Art Thou?
At the beginning of September I was beginning to give up again when one day I was talking to Joe on Facebook. I mentioned that I'd tried finding them again but it didn't work. Joe, Nathan, and Josh had since lost contact and Joe didn't even know where they were. HOWEVER, Joe did know that Nathan was on Facebook and gave me a link to his profile but he didn't seem to get on Facebook very much. I followed the link and sure enough, it was definitely him. I added him as a friend and wrote a message with it. Then I looked through his pictures and got teary looking at him and Nathan. I was happy to see that they were still together and doing well.
I hope you enjoyed my suggestions for a new facelift for your home. All the projects featured above can be done on a dime and with a short time frame!
I tend to consider it to be the most distinctly feminine passage in scripture.
And if the Dhimmi traitors and morons who support the Lib/Lab/con want to know what to do about illegal immigrants then go to Pakistan where they are currently in the process of deporting two million unwanted "guests" who have entered their country. Some of whom have been in Pakistan for over 27 years. Thanks for showing us how do to do it.
A: I got sick and found that I could no longer escape into the worlds that others were creating for me. Losing that outlet and having to live in my own head for quite some time brought all of the worlds and stories that I had succeeded in suppressing bubbling back up to the surface.
As part of its joint venture with Cinsay, Music Is Nirvana will bring on board more South Asian talent to create music portals and merchandising opportunities.
But I couldn’t just leave. What if someone finally came right after I left and I was that person who didn’t show for their first day of work? There’s no way I’d let that happen. Back to the café to kill time.
My hope is, that with posts like these, a simple internet search can help out someone who doesn't understand, and is willing to do some basic research.
RIDICULOUS!
Just look at how the beauty of written prose can be changed through text message speak. Taken from Wikipedia look at this “translation” of William Shakespeare’s A Midsummer Night’s Dream:
Any paralympian should consider distancing themseles from ATOS even if it means publically refusing to accept their medals from ATOS officials and dignitries
Anyone seen any clip on drum shades that cost around $25 for all FIVE? :)
Noah worked hard and long to honor God's command.
It all changed when I bought myself an ipod that fall, a 1st gen. I had absolutely no idea that the ipod would become what it is today. I didn't know much about it even at the time. I simply bought one so I could accompany my walks with all my music, not just a cd. It was a lot of money for me at the time - a lot. From the first day I used my ipod, my walks changed. I took the same routes but my mini-adventures seemed to expand. Instead of just people watching as I strolled, I also began to look up and look down. I began to really see the buildings, the architecture, the way the tree-lined streets provided dappled lighting to the stationary townhomes, the wrought iron details, different colors of brick, the cobblestone streets, and more and more. I am sure I had always noticed the *design* but with my music, I really saw it and I continue to see it everyday, everywhere. Soon I began snapping photos and then writing about it and then connecting to like-minded people and then meeting new friends and then starting new projects and more and more.
Just babies crying, diapers soiled and wet.
All I found were two small jars,
She thinks that as OCICBW... and Saint Laika's are my only source of income and because I am self-employed, I cannot just close everything down for two weeks. Evidently, being self-employed comes with responsibility. It has to be admitted, she has a lot more commonsense than me. Let's face it, my dog, Glenna, has a lot more sense than me and she isn't the brightest of border collies.
The lineup, which is not completely finished, includes a wide variety of music with both new and old bands:
My mom used to make chicken noodle soup for us for lunch every once in a while. I’m sure it wasn’t homemade. I didn’t like carrots or other vegetables floating around in the soup. I wanted noodles and that was about it. But, my sister always knew when the soup was ready before me. She was a sneaky little mole. I say mole because she wore coke-bottled glasses. So, the little mole would walk into the family room, carrying a big soup bowl and a spoon in one hand, and a sleeve of saltine crackers in the other. She would laugh at me in a little, sneaky, hiss, and then put her bowl on the coffee table. Yep, she did it again. She went into the kitchen and scooped most of the noodles out of the soup, leaving three strands of noodles and broth. Damnit.
The verdict was clear!
I'm thrilled to have the opportunity to speak with Rob and learn more about The Berlin Boxing Club.
I disapprove of it, so does Dave
Never given sight, never able to see.
This film also has one of the worst “sex” scenes I have seen in the longest time where Logan is blatantly shaking Beth’s left butt cheek and the film makes it seem like it’s some sort of cute showing of love and companionship but just came off as really lame and definitely a little too detailed for a PG-13 movie. I mean they show both of them moaning at one point and even though I’m no prude to this kind of stuff (hell, I saw ‘Shame’ for Christ’s sakes), I still don’t think that many parents will appreciate Ms. Schilling hitting a full-on orgasm with Mr. Efron.
Having traveled to the ends of the earth as a flight attendant, Ally Green has finally returned to the Lowcountry to bury her father as well as the past. But Vesey Washington is still living across the creek, and theirs is a complicated relationship—he was once her best friend . . . and also part of the reason she’s stayed away so long. When Ally discovers a message her father left behind asking her to quit running, it seems her past isn’t through with her yet.
3) There is a mineral called halite. It is salt, just like the salt on your table. And it turns out that being salt, it tastes like table salt. In the mineral identification unit, Mr. Geiger offered this wisdom. "If you're in the woods and find something that might be halite, pick it up and taste it. If it tastes salty it might be halite...or some hippie and his dog was there before you."
Hello everyone… we’re back from New Orleans! We had such an amazing trip… and we’ve got LOTS of good eats to fill you all in on.
Carrot, 1 pc, cut into small cubes
2 coordinated
Stir cheese into pâte à chou. Arrange level tablespoons about 1 inch apart on baking sheets. Sprinkle tops of gougères with black pepper and bake in upper and lower thirds of oven, switching positions of sheets halfway through baking, 30 minutes, or until puffed, golden brown and crisp.
“Europe and the United States are heading in two different directions. That became quite clear today as the manufacturing numbers for Europe were dismal while unemployment for the entire Eurozone reached 10.9% which is up 9.1% from last year. The entire Continent is in a recession, with the exception of Germany, and I think their next release, in mid May, will show that they have joined the rest of their brethern. Austerity has its costs and two of them are increased unemployment and a decline in demand for goods and services which is then exacerbated by the drop in the number of people that are working. All of this will get played out in a number of ways including a drop in the value of the Euro against the Dollar, ever widening spreads for European assets versus corresponding American assets and increasing costs for the refinancing of European bank and sovereign debt. As the effects of the LTRO wane and as it becomes apparent that there will be no new easing by the ECB; the problems mount. Liquidity wins in the short term but the issues of solvency and structural deficiencies remain and, being unsolved, they continue to weigh upon various credits and worsen their financials as investors take note and shed European assets. In the months ahead, for both political and economic reasons, I think we will see a flight back to American assets as the picture in Europe becomes both clearer and obviously worse.”
And it's all been said before
(a little more than food for thought)!
A week ago I had my annual general checkup. Other than my little melanoma problem I seem to be in very good health. It was a rare treat to visit my GP without having to get a bunch of stitches removed, although I’m not sure I’ll ever look forward to the prostate exam.
But the best thing about Bali was their people – friendly, eager -to-help often to the point of being intrusive , confused whether I was Spanish or Indian and why I was alone – and as I soon later understood one should reciprocate by asking questions about their children and families (quite similar to India!) They make the island the destination for travellers, lovers and families with their cuisine, mysticism, beliefs, their hospitality is renown for good measure and nothing tops the spas and foot massages; so ingrained in their daily lives.
The first thing I noticed and quickly commented on when I walked into Mr Therapist’s room this morning was it was missing certain things. The bookcase was completely empty, the shelves empty, and the, “thank you” cards on the wall were gone. I quickly posed a question, are you leaving? He found it odd that I would notice the room being almost empty. How can it be odd? That bookcase and those books have been my focal point for 20 sessions, when I could not make eye contact with him, I would read the titles of the books continually, or stir at the thank you cards stuck to the wall… there was nothing odd about noticing that now stood in front of me was a bare bookcase! Mr Therapist informed me that the person he shared the room with was leaving, looking at the now empty room with just a computer, desk, empty shelves, bookcase and a clock on the wall, there was nothing in there that belonged to Mr Therapist, it all belonged to the NHS or the other person whom he shared this room with! Prior to whoever has just left, the room was Dr L’s, therefore I suspect whoever took over her role has now departed for pastures new! Of course I am also aware that Mr Therapist’s main office is located elsewhere in the county, therefore I suspect somewhere he has a room like this, complete with books and thank you cards adorning the walls…
their berries' blood, up stiff
Oh what a day, got the older children off to school, messed with Roman & Bella's routine because they both had appts today so they had to stay home from school..started off ok though. We made a quick (5mins) trip to Home Depot for our blue light bulbs and a piece to fix a broken toilet handle (no one knows how it broke)
Having my family here with me will be the most important Mother's Day gift I could receive!
sea salt / ground pepper
That last one especially, where the mayday message CQD wasn't completed. Was the person giving the message overcome? Did they have to run for their life? Tragic.
It takes two hands to clap.
Vegetables- You can buy the frozen steamers kind that is listed on the grocery list. These are easy but I find the portions small and we need 2-3 to feed all 5 of us.
bone over town. Dragging his bone
Isn't she lovely? I have coloured her with copics (see details below) and added stickles to the butterflies' wings and green Spica pen to Wryn's wings. The clouds are cut with my Slice machine. The charm is from my stash and the silver butterflies are fancy staples placed with my Pin It. The seam binding ribbon is from The Ribbon Girl. The papers are from Simple Stories, crate Paper and October Afternoon.
Chemical Brothers Setting sun UK
She told me that if I ever wanted to go back on medication they could set that up for me. I said thank you.
By the end of this month I should have finished the treatment but it will go on working for a month after that. I could feel tired during that month too. Not sure what state I will be in by then. Only time will tell.
Me: "Ok, lets pour them in a bowl"
Saldaña: One of our greatest poets, our wisest voices, raulrsalinas. It’s sad he died, but he left behind a wealth of words. I had the joy of knowing him, watching him present at readings and schools, and that vato could command an audience, even a high school gym filled with teens who seemingly don’t care about anything.
Last Call at the Old Ponderosa by Paula Rhea McDonald
P.S. I am going to pick up my husband's race packet tomorrow in Galveston
...and last but not least, Rod who painted, assembled, hung stuff up, endured shopping with me and most importantly, had opinions & took an interest in this stuff! Love you. :)
It is very clear that either the Tun is living a life too high up or that his gurkas are not keeping him piped on the ground realities today.
-Jim Webb-webbjuice@comcast.net
Not only his species was hard to come by. Getting this picture was a challenge. Everyday when I came out the car he was nearby, but he is so skittish, I couldn’t get close. This blurry picture is the result of using my zoom function and cropping it down.
Heard the laughter, felt the tears
Unable to evolve, ENIAC became extinct. It could never have survived, other than as a museum piece, because of the following reasons.
I picked up this movie a while ago after I stumbled upon the trailer on YouTube. I thought that it looked promising so I decided “why the heck not?”(at the time I was also reading The Fault In Our Stars which might have affected my choice :P).
12. Rural Flesh Market (Violin by Surendra Singh)
“They were our size, love. They just wanted to honor them for their noble sacrifice for the rest of us, so we could build this city in peace.”
1/3 cup finely chopped fresh dill
12 Praise the LORD, O Jerusalem! Praise your God, O Zion!
Printable versions, you can edit yourself, can be downloaded from the printable tab located at the top of the site. Or directly from the links below...
I know it has been forevvvvvver since I've posted anything...and probably will be before I get a chance to do it again!! We're getting to the end of the school year so there are all kinds of field trips, Eqao testing for Jessie (finally done...phew!!) and of course swimming.
and who watched Beauty and the Beast as a child, and fantasized about that library...
the howling distances of that gape,
in the wait.
We are a Canadian based online Scrapbook Store filled with all the latest and greatest supplies! Our LCOM forum and gallery are filled with some great scrapbookers and a great place for you to join our challenges. We also have a great blog for some new ideas and inspiration! Come visit us!!"
Nevertheless, Mr Pyne continues to deny he had any prior knowledge of the claims Mr Ashby made in the Federal Court documents or that he had ever had a discussion with the staffer over his concerns about Mr Slipper.
It would seem that I have an obsession......xv
Disney was magical.
And the love and hope and happiness that he represents ...
After you find the recipes, and meals that you want to make, start writing it on your Menu Plan. Then you'll need to go back to your shopping list to add anything else that you need for the recipes. But in order to save the most money, you will need to STICK TO ONLY BUYING WHAT IS ON YOUR SHOPPING LIST!
POLITICS: This series helped convince me that a great deal of plastic surgery may not be medically necessary for terms of survival, but absolutely should be covered by insurance/disability/socialized medicine, simply because being a “freak” will cause you to be discriminated a lot more than being in a minority. Someone who is disturbing to look at is generally going to end up in a blue-collar profession, whether they want it or not.
As of 9:45 a.m. this morning I am several grams lighter and perhaps a little more dim than before.
Esha!
In a Tweet-length, here’s what happened:
Book Dimensions:
Eventually, I could stand it no longer and rang Dorset Police.
But I'm not there yet. Just thinking about it brings me to tears. It makes me shake.
Slowly but surely - ministry is a marathon, not a sprint.
Happy Brewing,
That never came…
Main deviation from the comic books:
Dorothy and Glinda: 'There's no place like home. There's no place like home.'
We hope you guys like the video and the music is of course from one of my favourite movies of all time, The Crow.
Oil – 4 tablespoons
Also, I'm making a major effort to update my links. Getting rid of dead blogs and adding cool new ones. If anyone wants to help by reporting dead links, new links for old blog, or just new good blogs to add, please do. Since every time I check I link I have to go back over the past year's posts (it's been that long since I checked most of them), it takes a while.
Next Week: Saturday Night Glee-ver
It was then left to me to update her on what was happening around Christchurch. I had seen the video footage taken by residents and I had heard the cries and fear in their voices. I knew that buildings had collapsed onto two buses. It was lunch hour in a busy city. Everyone was out...parents, children, students. It is a young city...a beautiful city. The possibility of fatalities was heart breaking. I had to choose my words carefully.
Which is to say, there seems to be plenty of scope for imaginative new approaches to the great adventures of Sherlock Holmes – I for one will certainly be greatly interested to see just how Elementary turns out when it arrives on the airwaves in the Autumn.
Each decision we make throughout the episodes are said to have an impact further down the line. So for instance, if we’re particularly friendly to a certain person, they’ll remember that in the future and act upon it. It also impacts the opposite side of the spectrum too. If you’re horrible to someone, you may find yourself on the receiving end of becoming zombie meat. If you decide to sentence a certain person to death (via the tough choice) then you may find the loss of that character effects the story in different ways.
preheat oven to 350. Heat milk and sugar to hot, add white chips and whisk to melt. Beat eggs, temper with hot milk, add the tempered eggs to the milk and whisk to combine.
6. You'll compromise. A lot. We went out to dinner with a couple from the prayer breakfast (February) who's been married almost 40 years. Dave and Marty's one word of advice? Compromise.
Today was day… wait I have to grab the beginners schedule… 40. So scheduled for today was Cardio and Balance and Agility. Except… there was no way I could fit those two workouts in today… so I flipped the days 39 and 40 workouts. So yesterday, day 39, I did 43 minutes of cardio and the balance and agility. It was the first time I did these back to back. I was a little tired. Okay a LOT tired.
As I saw it I seemed to burst upwards, out of the small, silent place, and suddenly there was noise again, and fear. Men shouted behind me. My breath rasped. I was shaking, exhausted, as if I had run a hundred miles, and my mind was fogged with grief.
I've needed to find someway to encourage myself,
Rhododendron ‘Tow Head’ (syn. ‘Towhead’) (R. carolinianum var. album x R. ludlowii) – Another 1968 introduction which is extremely hardy. ‘Towhead’ features pale yellow to greenish-yellow flowers borne on contrasting reddish stems, usually in late April. The dark green leathery foliage also takes on bronze highlights in autumn. Slow growing to 2-3′ high. Zone 5.
Spelling: You’ve proofed your MS to within an inch of it’s life (right? RIGHT?) so why would you rush through your query? Take a moment and make sure all your words are correctly spelled. You’d be amazed if I told you how many times someone has spelled query ‘queery’ or ‘querry’ or ‘quury’ (one out of every ten, usually).
In fact, that nature is partly to explain why Iris is at the asylum in the first place. A judge declares her insane, despite her protests to the contrary. No one will listen to Iris. She swears adamantly that her only crime is defying her husband, a wealthy Virginia plantation owner: “I am not a lunatic. I am the victim of a terrible campaign of outright slander by my own husband.” Her disobedience lands her in the asylum.
First things first, Abrams gives us a most sincere flattery here as he demonstrates a by-the-book tour of everything we go to a Steven Spielberg movie for, right down to his own script. The kids are all wide-eyed and full of their own ideas and immediate plans. Cary is never without a backpack full of firecrackers and matches. Charles is the tubby kid with big ideas and looking to his friends for validation of same. Martin is the quiet four-eyed kid with a quiet demeanor and queasy stomach. Preston is the gangly kid who usually hangs with the others because, well, what else does he have to do? Alice is the mysterious girl who has a kind of danger to her because... she's a girl! How much more mysterious could she be?
adviser to Condoleezza Rice, who graduated from the Roman Catholic
A few months back Little Yellow Bicycle had a call out for Cycling Team members...a monthly rotating team who gets to work with amazing product for a very generous and amazing company. I was honored to be chosen as a part of their Head of the Class Cycling Team.
Just stay, the closest we’ll get to perfection is what we have between us two.
